Dix-septième séance plénière
29 octobre 1987, à 15 h 10  Président : M. PUTZEYS ALVAREZ (Guatemala)  Seventeenth plenary meeting
29 OKTñ6pX 1987 r. B 15.10  npencenmenb: r-H IIYTCEkiC AJIbBAPEC (haTeMana)
(1.1) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Spanish):  Good afternoon, ladies and gentlemen. We shall resume the general policy  debate. In order to keep up the satisfactory pace at which we have been working,  may I remind speakers that their speeches should not exceed 20 minutes. I shall be  grateful for your co-operation.
(1.2) The first speaker on this afternoon's list is Mr Justin Thorens, President  of the International Association of Universities (IAU), whom I invite to take the  floor.
2.1 M. THORENS (Association internationale des universités) :  Monsieur le Président, Monsieur le Directeur général, Mesdames et  Messieurs les délégués, Mesdames et Messieurs, la salle où nous nous trouvons est  l'un des temples de la coopération internationale et le béton même de ses murs  est comme imprégné de l'encens subtilement dangereux et"enivrant des éloges dont  elle a fait l'objet. Et pourtant nous savons tous que cette coopération, du moins  sous sa forme la plus propre à favoriser une véritable solidarité mondiale,  c'est-à-dire sous sa forme multilatérale, traverse une période de crise profonde  aux conséquences encore imprévisibles. Les causes comme les manifestations de  cette crise sont multiples et peuvent être générales ou propres à telle organi-  sation. Quoi qu'il en soit, cette crise appelle une action vigoureuse et concer-  tée des hommes et des institutions qui non seulement croient en la coopération  internationale mais qui ne peuvent guère plus s'en passer que les humains d'oxy-  gène. Au nombre de ces hommes et de ces institutions, il y a bien sûr, au premier  rang, les universitaires et 'les universités.
2.2 Entre l'Unesco et les universités, les affinités sont essentielles en  ce qu'elles relèvent justement de leur essence même. Ce n'est pas seulement que  les universités sont précisément préposées comme institutions, au plus haut  niveau, à l'éducation, à la science et à la culture, ce qui en fait les parte-  naires obligees et naturelles de l'Unesco si celle-ci doit et veut accomplir sa  mission. C'est aussi, Mesdames et Messieurs, que les universités sont, par  nature, des organes de coopération internationale. En dehors même des nombreux  échanges de personnes qui ont lieu entre elles, les emprunts intellectuels et  scientifiques sont leur pain quotidien : que l'on songe à ce que serait la  bibliothèque d'une université qui ne comporterait que des ouvrages d'auteurs  nationaux qui n'auraient eux-mêmes jamais eu accès à des oeuvres autres que  nationales, ou à ce que serait une upiversité qui n'aurait jamais la visite d'un  professeur venu de l'étranger !
2.3 Dans le même domaine de la coopération internationale, les universités  ont un autre avantage, elle n'ont pas l'habitude de rompre leurs relations  diplomatiques et ne sont que partiellement affectées par les décisions de rupture  prises par les Etats. Face aux conflits et aux tensions qui divisent les nations,  elles restent souvent l'un des ultimes points de contact capables de dissiper  les malentendus et l'incompréhension nourris par l'ignorance et les différences.  On sait, hélas ! dans cette Maison que les décisions de rupture de certains Etats  ne concernent pas seulement leurs relations avec d'autres pays, mais aussi leurs  rapports avec les organisations internationales. Je n'entrerai naturellement pas  ici, car ce n'est pas mon rôle, dans les controverses nées de la politique de  l'Unesco, mais i l  m'incombe de souligner que la communauté universitaire consti-  tue en fait, soit directement, soit .par l'intermédaire de ses organisations, un  recours majeur contre la perte d'universalité due au retrait ou à l'absentéisme  de certains gouvernements - perte d'universalité, Mesdames et Messieurs, dont la  gravité ne peut être sous-estimée et qui à terme peut signifier la fin de votre  Organisation.  ' 546
2.4 Bien que non gouvernementale, l'Association internationale des univer-  sités elle-même est aussi une organisation de caractère mondial tant par les  universités qui en sont directement membres, que par ses Membres associés qui  proviennent de tous les pays. De ce fait même, elle n'est pas à l'abri, bien  sûr, de ia désaffection dont souffrent depuis plusieurs années les organisations  de ce type. C'est pourquoi je me permets de souligner, en ce moment caractérisé  par la mondialisation des problèmes, que nos organisations correspondent à un  besoin plus pressant que jamais. On ne résoudra pas les problèmes mondiaux en  ordre dispersé, SLJ une action concertée et organisée des détenteurs des res-  sources intellectuelles de l'humanité, dont, au premier chef, les universités.  Des collaborations croisées en tous sens sont un impératif catégorique de  l'heure. Je crois donc pouvoir profiter de l'hospitalité que me donne aujourd'hui  l'Unesco pour demander à votre Organisation et a ses Etats membres de soutenir
2.5 Je voudrais envisager maintenant une question fondamentale et qui me  tient, personnellement, particulièrement à coeur. Je pense d'ailleurs qu'elle  est a la fois a l'origine de l'Unesco et a l'origine de ses difficultés. I1 ne  s'agit pas pour moi de sous-estimer les autres matières, notamment celle du  développement. Je souhaite en revanche insister, en ce lieu, a l'aube de la  Décennie mondiale du développement culturel, sur cet autre domaine essentiel de  la compétence de l'Unesco qu'est la culture car, bien que chacun reconnaisse  aujourd'hui son importance, ce domaine reste plus que les autres difficile 5  cerner.
2.6 Cette difficulté peut être illustrée de manière, je crois, simple mais  saisissante par une citation empruntée a l'un des grands hommes de culture qui  ont eu l'occasion de s'exprimer dans cette salle : "Vous savez ce que c'est que  la culture, vous ? Bien, moi pas". Ainsi s'exprimait And- Malraux, orfèvre pour-  tant en cette matière qu'il s'avouait inc, ab. de défir , ce qui ne l'empêcha  pas - me direz-vous - d'en devenir ministre. Mais que dire alors de la perplexité  devant la culture de gens qui n'entretiennent pas avec elle de rapports aussi  évidents ? Par dela toutes les péripéties, je crains que ce facteur d'incerti-  tude - mais qui est aussi porteur de richesse car il nous interpelle tous et  constamment - ne constitue pour l'Unesco une interrogation permanente et en  quelque sorte originelle.
2.7 Le mot de culture ne figure qu'en dernière position dans la définition  que contient le nom même de votre Organisation, mais cette troisième place  n'exprime pas un rang dans une hiérarchie des priorités ; elle signale au con-  traire un lieu d'aboutissement et de confluence : l'éducatior. et la science sont,  chacune a leur manière, des tributaires de la culture qu'elles irriguent et ali-  mentent constamment. I1 n'est pas indifférent a mon sens que les fondateurs de  l'Unesco aient postulé et proclamé l'existence de "la" culture, au singulier, et  non pas seulement des cultures. Or c'est ce singulier qu'il nous faut interroger.  Car nous savons assez ce que sont les cultures au pluriel, dans l'acception  anthropologique si répandue aujourd'hui et que nous devons aux écoles américaines  et britanniques héritières elles-mêmes sur ce point de la conception du  Volksqeist allemand. On le sait, ou du moins on croit le savoir dans la mesure  où les cultures, prises dans ce sens, sont des constructions de l'esprit scien-  tifique. On s'applique, dans un premier temps, a inventorier l'ensemble des ele-  ments qui peuvent caractériser une societe donnée. par rxemple ses manières de  vivre, de communiquer, d'habiter, de s'alimenter, de coxevoir la parenté et  l'alliance, etc. Puis, dans un deuxième temps, on ~'efforc~? de repérer entre ces  domaines en apparence disparates des cohérences internes, des "structures" sous-  jacentes qui fondent l'unité - et du même coup l'unicité - de l'ensemble  considéré.
2.8 Une telle demarche est tout a fait légitime mais à la condition seule-  ment qu'elle reconnaisse ses propres limites. Elle risque, en effet, de mettre  entre pafentheses la manière dont les intéressés eux-mêmes, avec la sensibilité  qui leu'r est propre, vivent subjectivement les relations répertoriées. Mais, ce  qui eqt plus grave, Mesdames et Messieurs, elle peut aboutir, si l'on n'y prend  garde! à enfermer les individus dans un modele figé, à les assigner a résidence  dans une "identité" collective étroitement conçue.
2.9 En réaction Contre les aliénations et les déracinements - que la colo-  nisation avait entraînés dans son sillage - on a beaucoup insiste ces dernières  années, et a juste titre, sur la notion fondamentale d'identité culturelle. Mais  précisément, cette identité n'est qu'un fondement sur lequel il appartient a  chacun de se construire, de s'épanouir, en un mot de se développer, ou, plus  dynamiquement, elle est un donné - un don qu'il importe d'investir dans cette  entreprise de création d'une personnalité libre qui est la dignité de l'homme,  de tous les hommes quels qu'ils soient. Sous peine de devenir étouffante,  l'identité doit accepter le défi de l'altérité et du développement personnels,
547    de même que la recherche de l'universalité dans le respect des différences car  tous les hommes participent, et c'est l'essentiel, de la même nature et de la  même dignité.
2.10 Bien avant d'ailleurs que nous n'allions, comme on nous y exhorte si  souvent, ''6 la rencontre de l'autre", l'autre vient à la nôtre. Bien des éléments  que nous considérerons plus tard comme constitutifs de notre identité, les règles  de notre langue, notre éthique particulière de la vérité, les commandements  éventuels de notre religion, nous les éprouvons souvent à l'origine, VOUS et  moi, comme imposés de l'extérieur, par les autres. Corollairement, et c'est une  question insuffisamment étudiée bien qu'essentielle, nous sommes contraints à  exiler souvent dans l'altérité de l'inconscient ou du "ça" des pulsions tout à  fait intimes et que nous refusons pourtant de reconnaître comme nôtres. Entre  identité et altérité, les chassés-croisés sont constants et c'est le rôle de  l'éducation que d'encourager et de piloter cette dialectique.
2.11 Peut-être nous approchons-nous ainsi d'une définition de la culture qui  ferait apparaître une continuité entre ce que nous appelons la culture chez un  homme cultivé, la culture comme heritage et projet communs de l'humanité, et les  cultures comme élaborations singulières des groupes infiniment divers qui la  composent. Un homme serait cultivé à proportion de ce qu'il aurait su intégrer à  sa propre personnalité des éléments issus de son terroir culturel particulier et  des éléments venus d'un ailleurs temporel (par exemple les civilisations  anciennes), spatial (par exemple les autres civilisations) ou purement intellec-  tuel. Le mot intégration est ici important car la culture est évidemment autre  chose qu'une simple accumulation encyclopédique des savoirs.
2.12 Bien entendu, le dosage entre l'endogène et l'exogène dans la culture  de chacun et de chaque peuple peut être très variable et ne saurait être pres-  crit. Tel francophone, par exemple, peut trouver dans sa propre culture, en  l'occurrence chez Montesquieu, une incitation ironique à découvrir "comment on  peut être Persan", puis se passionner pour cette recherche au point de devenir  beaucoup Plus versé dans les lettres persanes, si je puis dire, que dans les  lettres françaises. Goethe l'a fait pour les romans chinois. Un tel homme devient  alors un artisan de la culture universelle, au sens où ce même Goethe et les  philosophes l'entendaient déjà, c'est-à-dire considérée comme patrimoine et  projet communs de toute l'humanité. Cette culture prend évidemment appui sur les  hommes cultivés : elle est à la fois le milieu complexe, tissé d'échanges inces-  sants, que ceux-ci secrètent collectivement, et l'ensemble des outils et des  supports qui permettent et agencent ces échanges.
2.13 A la fois conservatoires et stations expérimentales de pointe, les uni-  versités Sont à l'évidence des pieces maîtresses de ce dispositif. Et leur tra-  vail dans ces domaines me paraît reposer sur un postulat fondamental : c'est que  les cultures humaines ne sont pas et ne doivent pas être hermétiques les unes  aux autres et que, même si elles comportent des zones d'étanchéité, elles sont  capables de culminer en des créations qui deviennent le bien commun de l'humanité  tout entière et ainsi "la" culture.
2.14 "NOUS autres civilisations, nous savons maintenant que nous sommes mor-  telles" écrivait Paul Valéry au lendemain de la premiere guerre mondiale. En un  Sens, ceia est tragiquement vrai. En un autre, ceia méconnaît que même les civi-  lisations qu'on croyait mortes peuvent renaître sous une autre forme et que par  les oeuvres qu'elles nous ont laissées, les Civilisations continuent à nous  envoyer des radiations et des messages qui nous enrichissent.
2.15 I1 faut, dans ce contexte, insister sur le fait qu'aucune grande civi-  lisation ne doit oublier les apports qu'elle a reçus des autres, consciemment OU  inconsciemment, au cours des millénaires et des siècles. I1 convient aussi de  mettre spécialement en lumière les époques charnières où le flambeau de la civi-  lisation a passé d'un peuple à un autre, d'une ancienne civilisation à une autre.  Les célèbres écoles de traduction de Bagdad, de Palerme et de Tolède qui Ont  transmis la culture antique à la civilisation arabo-islamique, que cette dernière  a transmise à son tour à l'Europe, plusieurs siècles plus tard, en Sont un  témoignage éclatant. Et le phénomène se retrouve à d'autres épOqUeS et en  d'autres lieux sur tous les continents et dans toutes les familles culturelles.  Bien sûr, la civilisation actuelle, ou du moins ce qu'on peut, ce qu'on ose  appeler réellement de ce nom, est l'héritage de tous les hommes, parce que les  ancêtres de tous les hommes, même si c'est dans des proportions variables, ont  participé Solidairement à son développement et à son niveau actuel.
2.16 A une époque où, pour toutes sortes de raisons, nous risquons d'être  entraînés dans un redoutable processus de nivellement et d'homogénéisation, nous  avons cer,tes plus que jamais besoin de ces messages de la différence. Le respect  de la différence est heureusement devenu l'un des grands principes de notre
17  éthique ; il resterait cependant bien abstrait et exsangue s'il ne se soutenait  et ne s'éclairait de cette aptitude à goûter cette difference à partir du fonds  commun de la nature commune de tous les hommes. Pour prendre un exemple quelque  peu provocateur en ce lieu de paix, s'il est un trait commun à toutes les cul-  tures dont nous sommes issus, c'est bien, je le crains, l'exaltation de la vertu  guerrière. Qu'elles soient orales ou écrites, nous avons tous, dans toutes nos  civilisations, nos épopées qui, quant au fond, se ressemblent étrangement. Voilà  un principe d'unité qui, paradoxalement, est porteur de massacres. Et les- mas-  sacres, 6 l'âge nucléaire, risquent- de donner intégralement et définitivement  raison à Paul Valéry.
2.17 Nous sommes tous conscients qu'il y a là, incontestablement, un domaine  essentiel où il importe que la culture transcende les cultures, ce qui, après  tout, s'est déjà produit dans l'histoire. Ce domaine est particulièrement impor-  tant, car tout simplement, il est vital pour vous, pour moi, pour tous les hommes  quels qu'ils soient et d'où qu'ils viennent.
2.18 Pour revenir à la notion même de culture, je prendrai la région du monde  que je connais le moins mal, et ferai remarquer que les idéaux démocratiques  d'égalité et de liberté qui se sont peu a peu affirmés dans l'Europe des lumières  s'inscrivaient a contre-courant des "cultures" qui y dominaient alors et qui  étaient très fortement hiérarchisées, et tendaient a enserrer les individus dans  un reseau dense de liens et d'appartenances de toutes sortes : sociale, reli-  gieuse, professionnelle, etc.
2.19 On pourrait certainement trouver d'autres illustrations de ce phénomène,  mais il est des exemples de dépassement d'une culture par elle-même, et des  exemples de dépassement que le simple inventaire scientifique des éléments de  son "identité" n'aurait guère permis de prévoir. De la même manière, il nous  faut tous ensemble tenter de transcender et de sublimer sous d'autres formes  d'émulation, et non de supprimer - ce qui de toute façon serait contraire a la  nature de l'homme et d'ailleurs impossible - ce que notre héritage non seulement  biologique, mais proprement culturel, comporte de belliqueux. La menace nucléaire  rend cette tâche particulièrement urgente et nécessaire ; la persistance des  oppressions et donc de la problématique des guerres "justes" la rend singulière-  ment complexe.
2.20 Les universités ne peuvent éluder ces questions qui appellent la mobi-  lisation et la conjugaison de presque toutes leurs disciplines. Les problèmes de  la paix et de la guerre doivent sortir de la sphère de l'optatif - de l'énoncia-  tion de ce qui est souhaitable - voire du normatif - de la formulation des règles  dont rien ne garantit l'application - pour être étudiés en profondeur. La genèse  extraordinairement complexe et multidimensionnelle du conflit devra de plus en  plus constituer l'un des axes de nos recherches. C'est l'un des domaines ou  l'enseignement supérieur mondial et les institutions de la famille des Nations  Unies, qui ont la charge de ces problèmes, sont appelés à collaborer et c'est ce  a quoi, au nom des universités du monde, je vous invite.
2.21 On me dit, Monsieur le President, que c'est la premiere fois qu'un pré-  sident de 1'AIU a l'honneur de prendre la parole devant la Conference générale  de l'Unesco réunie en seance plénière. Je remercie ceux qui m'en ont donne l'oc-  casion. Si j'ai cru devoir la saisir, c'est qu'il m'a paru nécessaire, en ce  moment de crise majeure de la coopération internationale, d'affirmer sans ambi-  guïté la nécessité d'une étroite collaboration entre tous ceux qui ont la charge  de l'éducation, de la science et de la culture, de souligner l'importance de  l'universalité, c'est-à-dire de la collaboration de tous les pays sans exception  dans ces domaines, et de rappeler ici la responsabilité qui est la nôtre à  l'égard de ceux que nous représentons, c'est-à-dire des hommes, de tous les  hommes, quels qu'ils soient et d'où qu'ils viennent. Dans ce sens, vous me per-  mettrez, au nom des universités du monde entier, quels que soient le régime  politique et le niveau de développement de leur pays, au nom de toutes les uni-  versités donc, de vous rappeler l'importance du rôle qui est le vôtre comme ins-  tance internationale suprême dans les domaines de l'éducation, de la science et  de la culture - et de conclure, Monsieur le President, en hommage à une grande  civilisation, par cette citation d'un penseur d'aujourd'hui que nous devons à  l'Islam, Nadjm Oud-Dine-Bammate, "...la pensée n'est pas seulement prise de pos-  session de l'objet par le sujet, mais expérience transformatrice du sujet lui-  même ; ... elle n'est pas seulement création d'idées, de formes et de valeurs,  mais création d'être...". Mesdames et Messieurs, je vous remercie.
(3) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Spanish):  I thank the President of the International Association of Universities for  his statement and I now invite H.E. Mr Boualem Bessaieh, Minister of Culture and of  Tourism and head of the delegation of Algeria, to take the floor.
(4.1) Mr BESSAIEH (Algeria) (Translation from the Arabic):  Mr President, Mr Chairman of the Executive Board, Mr Director-General, I  wish to join the preceding speakers in congratulating you, Mr President, on your  unanimous election to the presidency of our General Conference. Your personal  qualities and your long and varied experience in the fields of science and culture  both in your own country and internationally add to our satisfaction at your  election and are a sure guarantee of the successful outcome of the present session.  You are taking over the office of President from the academician Mr Todorov, whose  competence, courtesy and efficiency in fulfilling its duties I wish to commend. May  I also take this opportunity to extend my warmest greetings to Mr Amadou-Mahtar  M’Bow and to pay a special tribute to his great achievements of the past 13 years,  during which he worked to make the ideals for which Unesco was founded a reality and  to attain its objectives of ensuring a better future for humankind. This loyal son  of the Third World who became a true citizen of the world devoted himself to his  calling with unshakeable faith and determination, and neither unjust criticism nor  the adversity of the international political and economic environment checked the  momentum of his courageous and persevering struggle on behalf of culture, science,  better understanding among peoples, the defence of freedom and peace.
(4.2) Mr President, the international context in which our conference is taking  place is unfortunately fraught with serious risks to international peace and  security arising in particular from the widening gap between the rich countries and  the developing countries, the constant tension in many parts of the world and the  persistent policies of occupation, aggression and racial discrimination in the  Middle East and Africa.
(4.3) Mr President, the world economic situation is continuously deteriorating as  a result of monetary disorder, the massive debt burden and relentless economic  protectionism, a combination of circumstances that has seriously undermined  political and social stability in many developing countries, thwarting their  development efforts and in some cases compromising their struggle for survival.  Recognition of the economic interdependence of the rich Countries and the countries  of the Third World and of the consequent need for solidarity should make all  countries face up to the fact that the roots of the crisis lie in the present  international order and that only deep structural changes in international economic  relationships in line with the principles of the new international economic order  can usher in a new era of justice and fruitful co-operation among the peoples of the  world. This is one of the developing countries’ basic demands and an essential  prerequisite for the preservation of international peace and security, because peace
17  and development, Mr President, will always be inseparable. As long as economic  relations are based on inequality and injustice which exacerbate disparities and  contradictions, and as long as the prosperity and affluence of a minority of  countries are paralleled by the poverty and distress of a majority of the world's  inhabitants, our hopes for the establishment and preservation of lasting peace and  stability will remain a delusion.
(4.4) Alongside the basic challenge of development, another equally serious  challenge facing the world is that of disarmament. Algeria, a country that supports  all initiatives to end the arms race, demands that a portion of the resources  released through disarmament should be allocated to development, given the  indisputable relationship between these two challenges.
(4.5) But development problems, Mr President, are not the only source of  concern. In the Gulf region a war of unparalleled futility and absurdity still  rages between Iran and Iraq, claiming hundreds of thousands of human lives, causing  untold material damage and seriously hampering the development of two cultures which  may be following different paths but are essentially similar and have both been  major contributors to the history of civilization. We address a brotherly appeal to  the two belligerents to end their hostilities and open negotiations for a peaceful  solution, as demanded by good neighbourliness, the interests of both peoples and the  need to preserve dialogue among cultures.
(4.6) In the Middle East the Palestinian people are still the victims of  oppression, occupation and the denial of their inalienable right to found an  independent State in their own land of Palestine. My country is deeply concerned by  the Islraeli practices in the occupied Arab territories, seeking to undermine the  cultural identity of the Palestinian people. Algeria therefore continuously  denounces the attempts of the Zionist entity to make fundamental changes in the  cultural and spiritual character of the city of Jerusalem and my delegation strongly  encourages Unesco in its laudable efforts in this connection, for it has a duty to  help redress the historical injustice done to the Palestinian people.
(4.7) Mr President, we believe in our region that justice and reason will prevail  over the force of arms and that the people of the Western Sahara will exercise their  right to self-determination and independence in accordance with the resolutions of  the Organization of African Unity and the United Nations.
(4.8) We shall continue, as is our duty, to combat the racist policies pursued by  the regime in Pretoria in defiance of the international community and in contempt of  all civilized values. And as though this were not enough, Pretoria continues its  illegal occupation of Namibia and seeks to disturb the balance and stability of the  front-line States. Apartheid is not only an oppressive system and an offence  against human dignity and universal values. It is also a crime against humanity,  debasing not only those who practise it but also those who tolerate it in any way.
(4.9) Mr President, I do not intend to dwell on the international situation and  current affairs. Let me turn instead to some of the subjects regularly submitted to  this Conference for its consideration. For some years Unesco has been engaged in  generating awareness of the serious imbalance in the transmission of information,  which has severely damaged the interests of the Third World inasmuch as information  and communication play a vital role in any development process through the  transmission of cultural messages. By dint of its unremitting efforts, our  Organization has succeeded in creating a consensus on the need for a New World  Information and Communication Order designed to ensure fairness and efficiency. We  have noticed, however, that in spite of the positive recommendations in this  connection formulated by Unesco and the United Nations General Assembly, there is  still a wide gap between declared intentions and practical action. Furthermore, the  gap is constantly widening as a result of rapid advances in technology and the media.
(4.10) Mr President, information on major world events is still largely  transmitted through channels owned by huge multinational corporations that virtually  monopolize both the sources and the processing of news. They also control the way  news is presented and its destination in accordance with specific interests. The  negative implications of such a situation are perfectly clear. The developing world  imports from the north not only its image of the outside world but also its own  image, deliberately deformed by the ethnocentrism of the developed countries. It is  legitimate for our peoples, who have been invaded by images from the developed  world, to seek facilities for creating their own images, faithfully reflecting their  life-styles, values and sentiments. This is the only way of initiating a real  dialogue of cultures, for the existence of differences does not imply conflict, and  diversity can be mutually enriching and lay the basis for a genuine flowering of  world culture.
(4.11) In this connection I should like to mention a project that will certainly  be one of the major events of the end of this century. I refer to the proclamation  by the United Nations General Assembly of a World Decade for Cultural Development,
553    The scope and significance of this event should ensure it full media coverage and  the widest possible international audience. Moreover, this praiseworthy initiative  calls for the mobilization of large-scale support and assistance in order to ensure  the balanced development of cultural relationships based on co-operation and  understanding among States and friendship and solidarity among peoples. Algeria  will not fail to work earnestly for the success of this venture and to support the  various programmes planned.
(4.12) Mr President, during the past few years the international community has  become increasingly aware of the importance of cultural heritage and its role in  shaping and reflecting cultural identities. Unesco has been actively involved in  this process, continuously stressing the need to study, safeguard and restore  museums, archaeological sites and monuments and to publicize them as widely as  possible. My country has drawn up a major programme over the last two years with a  view to reorganizing museums, setting up a national agency for archaeology and the  preservation of archaeological sites and monuments, and initiating other activities  designed to strengthen the structures of the heritage, a vital prerequisite for any  in-depth scientific analysis of our cultural identity. Two particularly ambitious  projects should be mentioned in this connection: the development and extension -  from 8,000 to 800,000 square kilometres - of the National Park of Tassili, which is  internationally renowned for its engravings and paintings, and the development of  Ahaggar Park, an area of 400,000 square kilometres containing immense cultural and  natural wealth.
(4.13) I wish to take this opportunity to thank Unesco, the World Heritage  Committee and the Man and the Biosphere programme for their assistance in conserving  and developing the National Park of Tassili, which has been included in the World  Heritage List and has become a biosphere reserve.
(4.14) In the same context I should like to commend Unesco's contribution to the  international meeting on 'Films and Archaeology' organized recently in my country.  This event was attended by many specialists of international renown in the field of  archaeological research and excavation and from the film world. Its success was  such that the competent Algerian authorities decided to respond favourably to the  participants' recommendation concerning the organization of a meeting on the subject  every two years in the city of Tipaza, well known for its archaeological sites and  records. I trust that Unesco will continue to use its valuable influence to ensure  that this event receives worldwide attention. It is a matter of promoting  international awareness, among young people in particular, of the importance and  value of the cultural heritage as a record of what the present owes to the past, a  contribution that must be recognized and immortalized in human memory. Algeria has  therefore drawn up a large-scale information programme on the heritage for children  and young people. It will reach at least six million children receiving free  schooling and 200,000 students in 27 university towns across the country. We  consider it necessary to involve young people - who represent a majority of the  population in the developing countries - in cultural life and in preserving the  heritage and transmitting its values to future generations.
(4.15) We are therefore pleased to note that the draft regular budget before us  maintains most activities relating to education and the Participation Programme at  their level of the 1986-1987 biennium. We feel that our Organization's efforts to  maintain the level of educational activities in spite of - hopefully temporary -  difficulties exacerbated by the world economic crisis deserve to be commended.
(4.16) Mr President, I cannot conclude without mentioning what has become known as  Unesco's crisis. The events that have been agitating our Organizicion for the past  few years, the disruption of its budget, the threats of kiithdrawal and the  undermining of its universality are neither isolated nor fortuitous phenomena but  part of a comprehensive scheme by those who possess power and henre decision-making  force to damage the organizations of the United Nations system, which are outside  their sphere of influence and control, and to deprive them of their basic function  of contributing to the conceptual and cultural formulation of a mutually supportive  approach to development in keeping with the demands of our era. Instead they want  to turn them into mere agencies providing technical assistance for a limited number  of operational activities. This scheme is just one more manifestation of the  struggle between an old order seeking to hold on to its privileges at all costs and  a new one seeking to pull down the archaic structures of the past and introduce a  new scale of values in conformity with the ideals of justice and equity.
(4.17) However, Mr President, since the end of the Second World War far-reaching  changes have occurred in the world environment and in basic structures, enabling  many peoples to fulfil their aspirations to freedom and dignity. The organizations  of the United Nations system played a leading role in setting this dynamic and  progressive process in motion. Their greatest merit, especially in the case of  Unesco, has consisted not only in furthering the mutual understanding and friendly  coexistence of different religions, cultures and philosophies, but also in promoting
554    world dialogue for the benefit of humankind as a whole. But these changes were not  brought about without a fierce struggle occasioned by conflicting interests.  Yesterday's majority, which has become today's minority, is stubbornly resisting the  trend of the times and the logic of history and progress. It refuses to accept  reality or submit to the facts, and while reluctantly recognizing that its scale of  values, so recently predominant, has been eclipsed, it persistently seeks to impose  its influence and authority, even if it means changing the democratic rules that it  once formulated, particularly as regards decision-making.
(4.18) Mr President, Unesco draws its strength from its vitality, its ability to  adapt itself to changes in the international community and also from the political  determination of its Member States - regardless of their population and size - to  work towards enhancing its role in a context of absolute equality of all partners,  equal respect for their interests and solidarity among peoples. Algeria,  reaffirming its commitment to the Organization's values, will spare no effort to  make Unesco an effective tool for the accomplishment of its objectives. It must  continue to be a framework for unity instead of fruitless conflict, for movement and  progress instead of inertia and sterility, a place of hope and not of frustration  and despair, and a forum in which every people has a voice and every voice an  audience. Unesco, as an agent of conciliation rather than discord, promotes good  fellowship among human beings and shuns egoism and cliquism, serving human  solidarity and not blind interests. It must therefore act as the conscience of the  human race, keeping watch over its cultural genius, its educational dimensions and  its respect for freedom. Unesco must remain a beacon of hope and a hymn of praise  to life, civilization and equality.
(4.19) Mr President, I should like to conclude with a quotation from a Western  writer. It is the last sentence in a book by the French author Georges Duhamel, who  in spite of his respect for the achievements of science wrote: 'Civilization is not  in the surgeon's scalpel: it is either in the human heart or it does not exist at  all'. Thank you Mr President.
(5) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Spanish):  I thank the head of the Algerian delegation for his statement. May I  remind you once again of the recommendation made in plenary to observe the  time-limit on speeches which has been laid down by the delegates themselves. You  are kindly asked to respect it. I invite H.E. Mr Nzege Alaziambina, State  Commissioner for Primary and Secondary Education, Chairman of the National  Commission of Zaire for Unesco and head of the delegation of Zaire to take the floor.  M. ALAZIAMBINA (Zaïre) :  Monsieur le Président, Monsieur le Directeur qénéral, Excellences,  Messieurs les ministres et chers collègues, distingués- délégués, Mesdames,  Messieurs, c'est pour moi un grand honneur et un agréable plaisir de prendre la  parole devant cette auguste assemblée a l'occasion de la vingt-quatrieme session  de la Conférence générale de l'Unesco. Avant toute chose, je voudrais m'associer  aux éminents orateurs qui m'ont precedes a cette tribune pour présenter mes vives  félicitations à S. Exc. M. Guillermo Putzeys Alvarez du Guatemala pour sa bril-  lante élection à la présidence de cette session de la Conference. Monsieur le  President, votre élection témoigne de la confiance et de l'estime que la commu-  nauté intellectuelle internationale place en votre auguste personne. Elle est  également, pour le Zaïre, le signe de vos grandes qualités d'homme d'Etat, de  culture et de science, qui ne menage aucun effort pour débattre des problèmes  relatifs à l'éducation. Aussi, ma délégation saisit-elle cette heureuse occasion  pour vous féliciter vivement.
6.2 Les vives félicitations du Zaïre s'adressent également à M. Nicolai  Todorov, académicien bulgare, qui a dirigé avec competence la Conférence géné-  rale de l'Unesco, et cela depuis le 8 octobre 1985 jusqu'a l'ouverture des tra-  vaux de la presente session. Je suis certain que sa remarquable contribution  figurera a jamais dans les annales de notre Organisation.
6.3 Que le Directeur général da l'Unesco, M. Amadou-Mahtar M'Bow, ainsi que  tout le Secrétariat trouvent ici l'expression de nos vives et sincères félicita-  tions pour avoir fait preuve de sagesse, d'intelligence et de maîtrise des  données de l'Unesco au moment OU l'Organisation a connu de grandes difficultés.  C'est grâce aux efforts déployés par le Secrétariat pour faire face a ces diffi-
555    cultés que cette vingt-quatrième session a pu avoir lieu. Vous connaissez,  Monsieur le Directeur général, la grande estime du Zaïre à votre égard. A tout  moment, vous pouvez compter sur lui.
6.4 Monsieur le Président, distingués délégués, Mesdames, Messieurs, le  Projet de programme et .de budget de l'Unesco pour 1988-1989 est la troisième et  dernière tranche du deuxième Plan à moyen terme pour 1984-1989. Le Zaïre constate  avec satisfaction que ce document est dans l'ensemble conforme tant au cadre  général du Plan susmentionné qu'aux directives que le Conseil exécutif de  l'Unesco, dans sa décision 125 EX14.2, a formulées à la lumière des réponses  issues de la consultation menée en 1986 par le Directeur général auprès des Etats  membres, des Membres associés et des organisations internationales gouvernemen-  tales et non gouvernementales. L'expérience de la mise en oeuvre du deuxième Plan  à moyen terme nous incite à encourager le Directeur général à proceder à une  large consultation pour l'élaboration du troisième Plan à moyen terme afin de  pouvoir le fonder sur les préoccupations de tous les Etats et organisations con-  sultés. Telle est la raison pour laquelle ma délégation souhaite un élargissement  de la consultation qui permettrait d'approfondir la réflexion amorcée au cours  du deuxième Plan à moyen terme.
6.5 En outre, le Zaïre note avec intérêt certaines améliorations sensibles  réalisées conformément à la décision 125 EX/4.2 adoptée par le Conseil exécutif  de l'Organisation. Ces améliorations concernent notamment la fusion des cibles  et résultats attendus sous une seule rubrique intitulée "Résultats attendus",  qui contient des indicateurs quantifiés et concrets destinés à faciliter l'éva-  luation des activités de l'Organisation. Le Zaïre est également sensible à l'in-  téressante initiative prise par le Secrétariat de présenter, pour chaque grand  programme et programme, un tableau indiquant la répartition des dépenses rela-  tives à chaque action. Ce type d'analyse peut être amélioré pour constituer un  meilleur instrument de programmation, d'évaluation et, en fin de compte, de  prise de décision.
6.6 Monsieur le Président, distingués délégués, Mesdames, Messieurs, la  délégation zaïroise apprécie à leur juste valeur les efforts déployés par le  Secrétariat pour aboutir à une concentration accrue du programme. Mais, tout en  étant favorable à ces efforts, elle estime, pour sa part, que la concentration  de ce même programme ne devrait pas constituer une raison ou un prétexte pour  vider certains grands programmes de leur contenu et réduire le budget  correspondant.
6.7 La politique de decentralisation de l'Organisation a retenu l'attention  du Zaïre qui en encourage la poursuite. En sa qualité de pays hôte de la repré-  sentation de l'Unesco aupres des Pays des Grands Lacs et pour le plus grand  intérêt de l'Afrique centrale tout comme de l'Unesco, le Zaïre, d'un commun  accord avec bon nombre de pays voisins, sollicite un élargissement du champ  d'action de ladite représentation pour permettre à l'Afrique centrale tout  entière de profiter suffisamment des activités de notre Organisation. L'engage-  ment d'un personnel local et l'augmentation du budget de la représentation sont  évidemment des problèmes liés à celui de l'élargissement du rayon d'action de la  représentation.
6.8 Dans le même ordre d'idées, le Zaïre souhaite que soient accélérés les  travaux relatifs 6 la nomination d'un Directeur général avec statut Unescopas  pour le Centre de coordination des recherches et de documentation en sciences  sociales desservant l'Afrique subsaharienne. L'impact social de ce centre ne  pourra s'exercer que lorsque tout le personnel sera mis en place et que les  moyens nécessaires seront accordés pour en faciliter le fonctionnement. Le Bureau  africain des sciences de l'éducation, comme organisation internationale gouver-  nementale sous l'égide de l'organisation de l'Unité africaine (OUA), devrait  servir aussi d'organe d'exécution de certaines activités de l'Organisation. I1  est fort souhaitable que l'Unesco appuie ses activités dans le domaine de  l'éducation.
6.9 Monsieur le Président, distingues delegues, Mesdames, Messieurs, le  Zaïre, dans un document approprié, a déjà présenté au Directeur général ses avis  et considérations sur chacune des actions prévues dans le Projet de programme et  de budget de l'Unesco pour 1989-1989. I1 serait, me semble-t-il, fastidieux de  les reprendre en détail dans cette brève intervention. Aussi, d'une manière  générale, me contenterai-je de dire que le Zaïre, pays authentiquement épris de  paix, appuie et soutient ce Projet de programme et de budget tel qu'il est déve-  loppé dans ses quatorze grands programmes.
6.10 En ce qui concerne plus particulièrement le grand programme I - Ré-  flexion sur les problèmes mondiaux et etudes prospectives, mon pays note la place  accordée par l'organisation à la réflexion visant à trouver les voies et moyens  pour résoudre les problèmes mis en relief. I1 souhaite ainsi que cette réflexion  puisse se poursuivre.
6.11 I1 n'y a aucun peuple au monde qui puisse réussir son projet de société  sans un système éducatif adéquat. C'est dire toute l'importance que le Zaïre  accorde aux grands programmes II, IV et VI qui sont tous consacrés 5 l'éducation.  I1 est favorable & l'organisation en 1989 d'une Année internationale de l'alpha-  bétisation et propose & la Conférence générale de décider d'affecter des fonds  supplémentaires aux sous-programmes 11.1.2 et 11.1.3. Pour mieux réaliser son  projet de société, le Zaïre, après avoir promulgué, le 22 septembre 1986, la  loi-cadre de l'enseignement national, continue à s'atteler & la mise en oeuvre  de sa réforme scolaire, dont l'expérimentation prendra fin en 1990 afin de céder  la place à la généralisation. ici, l'accent est mis surtout sur la professionna-  lisation de l'enseignement secondaire en vue de rendre chaque enfant zaïrois  utile à lui-même et à la société. Nous apprécions vivement le concours technique  et matériel qu'apporte i'unesco à notre vaste entreprise.
6.12 En matière de science et de technologie, mon pays accorde une importance  capitale aux grands programmes VI, IX et X. La maîtrise de la science et de la  technologie constitue un atout majeur pour le développement endogène. Ainsi, le  Zaïre se réjouit des efforts que ne cesse de déployer l'Unesco en faveur de la  formation, de la recherche et de la coopération dans les domaines des sciences  exactes, naturelles, sociales et humaines. I1 est fort intéressé par l'exploita-  tion et la mise en valeur des ressources hydrogéologiques de l'Afrique. A ce  titre, i l  appuie le projet d'élaboration d'une carte hydrogéologique internatio-  nale de l'Afrique en 1988-1989.
6.13 Monsieur le Président, honorables délégués, Mesdames, Messieurs, les  activités humaines ont acquis une nouvelle dimension grâce a la communication,  grâce surtout aux nouvelles technologies de la communication. En conséquence, le  problème de leur utilisation qualitative et quantitative au service des peuples  se pose avec acuité. Soutenir les activités prévues dans le grand programme III  - La communication au service des hommes, cela signifie, pour la République du  Zaïre, appuyer le renforcement du Programme international pour le développement  de la communication (PIDC) ainsi que la réflexion qui s'y rapporte.
6.14 I1 est acquis aujourd'hui qu'il n'existe pas de modele de développernent  et que chaque peuple ou société humaine a le droit à l'autodétermination en la  matière. Le développement se veut donc un concept qui englobe plusieurs aspects  de la problématique mondiale. L'importance de la dimension culturelle dans le  développernent socio-économique de l'humanité n'est plus à démontrer pour le  Zaïre, qui a noté avec satisfaction et appuie l'importance accordée dans le  document 24 C/5 au programme d'action de la Décennie mondiale du développement  culturel. Son appui porte également sur les activités de coédition du matériel  de lecture en langues africaines, notamment le lingala, le kikongo et le  kiswahili, et cela en collaboration avec l'Angola et le Congo pour le lingala et  le kikongo, avec le Bu.rundi, le Kenya, le Rwanda et la Tanzanie pour le  kiswahili.
6.15 Monsieur le Président, Mesdames, Messieurs, jamais l'humanité n'a été  plus qu'aujourd'hui préoccupée par les maux si profonds que sont la violence,  l'intolérance, le racisme, l'apartheid, l'injustice et la violation des droits  de l'homme et des peuples. Jamais la conscience humaine n'a connu autant  d'épreuves qu'aujourd'hui. Pour essayer de remédier à cette situation, le maré-  chal Mobutu Sese Seko, président-fondateur du MPR, président de la République,  animé par sa vocation de paix, de justice, d'entente et de concorde entre les  peuples, a créé, par l'ordonnance no 86-268 du 31 octobre 1986, un département  du Conseil exécutif charge de s'occuper du cas de tout citoyen injustement lésé  dans ses droits ou libertes. Aux côtés de ce département fonctionne le Centre de  recherche interdisciplinaire pour la promotion et la protection des droits de  l'homme en Afrique centrale. Ce Centre, qui a son siège à l'université de  Kinshasa, a organisé, avec le concours de l'Unesco, un colloque-atelier sur  l'intégration sociale des Pygmées. Ce dernier a réuni les spécialistes de plu-  sieurs disciplines des sciences humaines, en particulier des anthropologues, des  juristes, des historiens, des sociologues et des philosophes. La réflexion amor-  cée devra se poursuivre au niveau des pays de la sous-région dans lesquels se  pose le même problème d'intégration sociale des Pygmées.
6.16 Monsieur le President, Excellences, Messieurs les ministres et chers  collègues, honorables délégués, Mesdames, Messieurs, j'en arrive finalement aux  activités prévues dans le grand programme XIV. Ma délégation se réjouit du fait  que ce grand programme présente une certaine harmonie de nature à nous permettre  de bien appréhender les problèmes auxquels la femme se trouve actuellement con-  frontée et de chercher les voies et moyens pour résoudre ces problèmes. Le Zaïre  encourage le Directeur général à poursuivre les activités prévues dans le grand  programme XIV et à chercher les ressources extrabudgétaires pour financer, comme  le Conseil exécutif de l'Unesco l'a recommandé lors de sa 126e session, les  activités opérationnelles au titre dudit programme. Bien plus, après avoir créé
557    un Département de la condition féminine et de la famille, le Conseil exécutif du  Zaïre soutient l'idée de la proclamation d'une "Année internationale de la  famille". A cette occasion, la possibilité sera donnée aux hommes comme aux  femmes du monde entier de rhfléchir sur l'état actuel de la famille ainsi que  sur le rôle de chacun au sein de cette communauté.
6.17 Conformément à une résolution adoptée par la Conférence générale de  l'Unesco à sa vingt-troisième session sur la célébration du quarantième anniver-  saire de l'Unesco, plusieurs manifestations ont été organisées au Zaïre par la  Fédération zaïroise des associations et clubs Unesco sous les auspices de la  Commission nationale zaïroise pour l'Unesco. Ces manifestations se sont clôturées  par un séminaire national qui s'est tenu à Kinshasa, du 13 au 15 juillet 1987,  et a bénéficié de la participation des membres de clubs Unesco de la République  populaire du Congo et d'éminentes personnalités scientifiques.
6.18 En conclusion, le Zaïre réaffirme son soutien à l'Unesco et son adhésion  aux idéaux et principes de l'organisation qui sont d'une actualité brûlante, 6  savoir le maintien et l'épanouissement de la paix par le développement de l'édu-  cation, de la science, de la culture et de la communication. Paix d'abord dans  le coeur des membres du Secrétariat. Paix ensuite dans le coeur des délégués des  Etats membres. Paix, enfin, dans tous les organes de notre Organisation. Car nous  pensons, Monsieur le Président, qu'avant de faire des recherches sur la paix et  d'enseigner la paix dans le monde, l'Unesco devrait d'abord être en paix avec  elle-même. C'est pourquoi le Zaïre assure le nouveau Directeur général que, con-  formément à l'Acte constitutif, la Conférence générale aura donné à l'organisa-  tion, qu'il oeuvrera avec lui pour réaliser une Unesco toujours plus unie et  toujours plurielle, une Unesco dans laquelle régnera toujours l'unité dans la  diversité.
6.19 Pour finir, permettez-nous de souhaiter la bienvenue au nouveau Membre  associé de notre Organisation, à savoir la belle île d'Aruba, et plein succès  aux travaux de la vingt-quatrième session de la Conférence générale. Je vous  remercie.
(7) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Spanish):  I thank the head of the delegation of Zaire for his statement. The  delegation of Togo has kindly informed that the speech of the head of the Togolese  delegation is to be preceded by a message from H.E. the President of the Togolese  Republic. I now invite H.E. Mr Tchaa Kozah Tchalim, member of the Political Bureau  of the Rassemblement du peuple togolais, Minister of National Education and  Scientific Research of Togo and head of the Togolese delegation to take the floor.
8.1 M. TCHALIM (Togo) :  Permettez-moi, Monsieur le Président, de donner lecture d'un message  qui vous est adressé par le général Gnassingbé Eyadema, président-fondateur du  Rassemblement du peuple togolais et président de la République togolaise :  "Excellence, Monsieur le Président,  Au moment ou débutent les travaux de la vingt-quatrième session de  la Conference générale qui coïncide avec le quarantième anniversaire de  l'Unesco, il m'est particulièrement agréable de vous adresser mon salut  sincère ainsi que mes voeux les meilleurs de plein succès.  Je saisis également l'occasion que m'offre cette vingt-quatrième  session pour renouveler, au nom du peuple togolais, de mon gouvernement  et en mon nom personnel, nos vives félicitations à l'Unesco pour ses  efforts inlassables dans la lutte contre 1 ' ignorance et 1 ' analphabé-  tisme, pour l'avènement d'un monde plus solidaire et plus juste.  Depuis la fin de la deuxième guerre mondiale, l'Unesco oeuvre pour  le renforcement des échanges dans les domaines des sciences, de l'édu-  cation, de la culture et de l'information. Les échanges favorisent non  seulement la connaissance mutuelle et la compréhension entre les  peuples, en créant un climat de confiance indispensable à l'existence  de relations internationales normales et stables, mais aussi une coope-  ration technique qui, en donnant à chaque Etat les moyens d'assurer son  propre développement, aboutira à la suppression des inégalités entre  les Etats et les peuples.
558    Je suis persuadé que par son oeuvre, l'Unesco participe activement  aux efforts tendant à empêcher un troisième conflit mondial, qui pour-  rait signifier l'élimination de l'espèce humaine, et à instaurer un  nouvel ordre mondial plus équilibré.  En dépit de tous ces efforts, notre monde reste toujours confronté  à de multiples problèmes qui menacent la paix et qui constituent autant  de défis à relever, 6 savoir : la pauvreté, les inégalités sociales, le  racisme, l'apartheid et la violation permanente des droits de ,$'homme.  Plus que jamais, l'Unesco apparaît comme un instrument indispensable à  la sauvegarde et au renforcement de la paix. I1 est donc urgent d'assu-  rer sa survie, de la redynamiser et de lui redonner confiance, elle qui  a pour ambition première de favoriser le développement de "l'esprit de  paix".  Nous avons le ferme espoir que cette vingt-quatrième session de la  Conference générale constituera une étape décisive dans la recherche  des solutions justes et durables aux grands problèmes de l'heure afin  que l'humanité puisse enfin acceder au monde de progres et de paix  auquel elle aspire tant.  Très haute considération."  (signé) Général Gnassingbé Eyadema
8.2 Monsieur le Président de la Conference générale, Monsieur le President  du Conseil exécutif, Monsieur le Directeur général, Messieurs les chefs des  délégations nationales, Messieurs les ambassadeurs, Mesdames et Messieurs, j'ai  le plaisir de presenter a S. Exc. M. Putzeys Alvarez les sincères félicitations  de la délégation togolaise et les miennes propres pour sa brillante élection a  la présidence de la vingt-quatrième session de la Conférence générale. Ce plaisir  est d'autant plus grand que nous avons la conviction que sa compétence et sa  grande sagesse contribueront au plein succès de nos travaux. Je saisis l'occasion  pour adresser au nom du Gouvernement togolais, présidé par le général Gnassingbé  Eyadema et en mon nom personnel mes salutations les plus cordiales au chef de la  délégation française. Nous lui saurons gré d'être notre porte-parole et de bien  vouloir transmettre notre profonde gratitude au Gouvernement et au peuple de  France pour l'hospitalité et les facilités qui nous sont offertes et qui contri-  bueront a la bonne réussite de nos assises. Je voudrais également rendre un  vibrant hommage au Directeur général, M. Amadou-Mahtar M'Bow, ainsi qu'au Secré-  tariat pour leur dévouement, leurs brillants efforts et pour les soins tout par-  ticuliers apportés aux préparatifs de cette vingt-quatrième session.
8.3 Monsieur le Président, cette vingt-quatrième session de la Conférence  générale de l'Unesco se réunit dans une conjoncture internationale critique et  morose. Face au terrorisme international et aux conflits armés, face aux guerres  fratricides et aux inégalités sociales, face au fossé sans cesse croissant entre  le Nord et le Sud, on sent, comme le disait Georges Duhamel, que "l'odeur du  monde a changé". Une odeur écoeurante de misere, d'injustice, de pauvreté que  respire le tiers monde en voyant s'évanouir toute "l'espérance du siècle dévo-  rée". La paix mondiale est menacée. Nous assistons, impuissants, à la dégradation  systématique des moeurs. La source de la morale universelle semble être tarie  par la chaleur ardente de l'égoïsme effréné des hommes, leur gout excessif du  bien matériel et de l'intérêt personnel. La dignité humaine est bafouée. L'ins-  tinct de domination continue de hanter l'esprit des plus forts. L'extermination  massive des peuples qui aspirent a leur liberté a encore droit de cite dans cer-  taines contrées. L'analphabétisme et le sous-développement ne reculent que len-  tement. Beaucoup de peuples restent éloignés des bienfaits de la science et de  la technique. Leurs chances de contribution au progrès dans ces domaines  demeurent quasiment nulles. Autant de problèmes sur lesquels notre Organisation  a l'impérieux devoir de se pencher afin de leur trouver des solutions adéquates.
8.4 Monsieur le President, il y a plus de quarante ans que l'Unesco a été  créée pour favoriser le progrès du savoir et promouvoir la coopération inter-  nationale par l'éducation, la science et la culture. Depuis quarante ans, sa  contribution au maintien de la paix dans le monde a été remarquable. Elle a  élaboré des programmes pour sensibiliser la communauté internationale aux pro-  blèmes du désarmement, dénoncé les méfaits des guerres qui engendrent de grands  fléaux, sanctionné énergiquement le racisme, l'injustice et l'apartheid, mis sur  pied des programmes pertinents pour une lutte efficace contre l'analphabétisme  et l'avènement d'hommes et de femmes aptes a mieux répondre leurs besoins  vitaux.
8.5 Malheureusement, en dépit de tous ces efforts - efforts oh ! combien  louables et féconds - beaucoup reste encore à faire. Ensemble, sans rompre la  chaîne de solidarité internationale qui nous lie, nous devons réfléchir a tous  les grands problèmes qui se posent a notre monde : ensemble, nous devons oeuvrer  pour trouver les voies et moyens qui nous permettront d'évoluer vers des lende-  mains radieux. La délégation togolaise pour sa part ne ménagera aucun effort  pour apporter sa modeste contribution au bon déroulement des travaux de cette  session.
8.6 Le Togo approuve sans réserve la ligne directrice des grands programmes  établis. Au sein des commissions constituées durant cette session, les délégués  de ce pays ne manqueront pas de faire part de leurs observations et de leurs  suggestions en ce qui concerne ces programmes. Cependant, qu'il me soit permis  de formuler' ici quelques observations préliminaires sur les documents qui nous  sont soumis.
8.7 Après un examen attentif du Projet de programme et de budget pour 1988-
1989, nous avons été pleinement satisfaits des efforts déployés pour maintenir  les propositions dans le cadre des orientations et de la stratégie d'action  définies dans le plan pour chaque grand programme. Les priorités accordées dans  le programme à certaines activités de l'Unesco procèdent sans nul doute des  enseignements tirés des sessions précédentes, notamment celle de Paris en 1983  et celle de Sofia en 1985.
8.8 S'agissant du grand programme I, ma délégation est heureuse de constater  que les objectifs poursuivis correspondent avec ceux du Gouvernement togolais.  Ces objectifs épousent parfaitement les idées-forces du Président Eyadema sur la  paix, le désarmement et la sécurité dans le monde.
8.9 Ma délégation appuie également les activités prévues au titre du grand  programme II. Elle invite vivement l'Unesco à intensifier ces activités malgré  les contraintes financières qui lui sont imposées. 11 est réconfortant de cons-  tater que les priorités définies au niveau de notre institution commune sont en  harmonie avec les orientations décidées par notre parti, le Rassemblement du  peuple togolais. Nous pouvons citer, à titre d'exemple, l'une des résolutions  adoptées par le quatrième Congrès statutaire du parti, en décembre 1986, en ce  qui concerne les secteurs de l'éducation et de la formation. Aux termes de cette  résolution, il est urgent "de faire procéder à une évaluation objective de la  réforme de l'enseignement pour que soient entrepris les réajustements néces-  saires ; de poursuivre les efforts déployés pour la formation et le recrutement  d'un personnel enseignant et d'encadrement compétent ainsi que son perfectionne-  ment permanent ; de créer au niveau des enseignements des deuxième et troisième  degrés les structures de formation prévues par la réforme afin d'assurer une  préparation professionnelle à tous les jeunes sortant de l'enseignement général ;  d'insuffler, d'entretenir et de développer dans l'esprit du jeune, l'amour de  l'effort, la volonté de persévérance et la soif de dépassement de soi". Le con-  grès a en outre mis un accent particulier sur la formation et le perfectionne-  ment des maîtres ainsi que l'association de tous les partenaires à l'oeuvre  d'éducation.
8.10 Le Gouvernement togolais porte un intérêt tout particulier à l'éducation  et à la formation et met tout en oeuvre pour l'amélioration des structures SUS-  ceptibles de lui permettre d'atteindre ses objectifs. Il est tout & fait cons-  cient du fait que l'éducation constitue pour le citoyen un droit inaliénable, la  source de son épanouissement moral et intellectuel. Aucune discrimination ne  saurait subsister dans cet important domaine. C'est pourquoi le Gouvernement  togolais, malgré ses moyens très limités, consacre tous les ans près de 20 % de  son budget à l'éducation. Une place toute particulière est réservée à la jeune  fille ; quant aux femmes plus âgées, un programme d'alphabétisation fonctionnelle  est organisé à leur intention dans les villes et les campagnes. Cependant, en  dépit des efforts mobilisés sur tous les plans, les résultats ne sont pas tou-  jours à la hauteur des attentes, aussi bien au plan de l'extension du taux de  scolarisation qu'a celui de la qualité de l'enseignement dispensé. Rester inat-  tentif à ce phénomène correspondrait à une démission devant ses responsabilités.  ici et là, on évoque une seule et même cause : ia crise économique et les con-  traintes auxquelles sont confrontés les pays du tiers monde en général et ceux  d'Afrique en particulier. Certains experts sont déjà à pied d'oeuvre en vue de  pallier cet état de choses. Les solutions proposées sont nombreuses et contra-  dictoires. D'un côté, on préconise l'accélération des programmes de formation  des formateurs, de l'autre, on conseille des mesures draconiennes pour freiner  les dépenses publiques et le recrutement des maîtres. Le dilemme est de taille.  Le mal s'étend et s'étendra à toute l'Afrique. I1 faut lui trouver le remède  drastique qui le fera disparaître totalement de notre continent.
8.11 Monsieur le Président, le grand programme sur la communication au ser-  vice des hommes rdpond dans sa globalité aux voeux de la Conférence de San José  de juillet 1978 et est conforme aux résolutions sur la communication adoptées  lors des sessions de la Conférence générale de l'Unesco qui se sont succédé  depuis lors. Comme nous le rappelle le Directeur général dans "Le temps des  peuples", "la communication n'est pas un système clos - un circuit fermé. A la  limite, la démocratisation de la communication - la démocratie tout court, sup-  pose l'accès et la participation ... 11 importe que ce processus soit ouvert à la  problématique sociale." Autrement dit, en tant que besoin social, la communica-  tion doit être développée partout dans le monde. Ma délégation note avec satis-  faction la priorité accordée aux activités proposées au titre de ce programme,
17  notamment en ce qui concerne le développement de la communication. Elle encourage  très vivement 1'Unesco.à poursuivre ses objectifs en dépit des accrocs et des  embûches placées par Ses détracteurs. Elle approuve sans réserve le PIDC et  souhaite participer activement à toutes ses activités.
8.12 Le grand programme IX a également retenu toute l'attention de ma déle-  gation. Le processus engagé depuis plus d'une décennie, sous l'impulsion de  l'Unesco, en vue de développer les programmes de vulgarisation scientifique et  technologique dans mon pays a beaucoup évolué et ses résultats sont encoura-  geants. Des efforts importants ont été consentis pour y faire participer de façon  active bon nombre d'hommes et de femmes. I1 est regrettable que la conjoncture  économique imposée à nos pays en développement ne permette pas d'investir dans  ce domaine tous les moyens financiers qui auraient été nécessaires, malgré les  priorités clairement définies par le gouvernement. Nous sommes persuadés que la  nouvelle restructuration de la recherche scientifique au niveau national, décidée  en 1985, notamment la mise sur pied d'une direction nationale chargée de la  coordination de la recherche scientifique, permettra de mieux rentabiliser les  efforts consentis.
8.13 Les activités prévues dans le grand programme IX ont été renforcées et  font l'objet de propositions constructives. Nous nous en félicitons d'autant  plus qu'elles concordent avec les décisions prises lors du quatrième Congrès  statutaire du Rassemblement du peuple togolais de décembre 1986, à savoir :  l'implantation des infrastructures culturelles dans toutes les régions du Togo  en vue de favoriser le développement de l'action culturelle et la préservation  du patrimoine culturel ; la revalorisation et la diffusion de la culture togo-  laise sur le double plan national et international.  a. 14 Monsieur le Président, l'homme, depuis des temps tres reculés, est  demeuré primitif par ses haines, ses désirs, ses peurs. I1 lui faut oeuvrer pour  créer un milieu favorable à son épanouissement. I1 ne suffit pas de former des  cadres administratifs et techniques très qualifiés. I1 faut également changer  les attitudes, changer, parmi les comportements sociopsychologiques hérités des  cultures traditionnelles, ceux qui sont négatifs. I1 faut réarmer moralement  l'homme. Autrement dit, renforcer les actions en vue de l'élimination des préju-  ges, de l'intolérance, du racisme et de l'apartheid a l'échelle du globe.
8.15 Pour ce qui est du problème de l'apartheid, c'est avec consternation et  une grande inquiétude que nous constatons le peu de progrès accomplis. Est-ce  une victoire du régime raciste sud-africain sur le reste de la communauté inter-  nationale ? Depuis notre dernière session de Sofia en 1985, plus de 30.000 per-  sonnes ont été arrêtées en Afrique du Sud ; par ailleurs, plus de 10.000 enfants  étaient détenus en 1986, dont 57 % n'avaient pas 16 ans, d'après les renseigne-  ments fournis par le Monde diplomatique de juin 1987. Notre Organisation doit  entreprendre de toute urgence, de concert avec les autres institutions de l'ONU,  des actions contre l'apartheid en Afrique du Sud et contre la poursuite de  l'occupation illégale de la Namibie.
8.16 En ce qui concerne la paix, permettez-moi, Monsieur le President, de  VOUS exprimer le désir ardent de ma délégation de voir l'Unesco poursuivre et  renforcer son action, en vue de l'avènement d'un climat de paix dans le monde  entier. Comme l'a souligné le président Eyadema, "Nous souhaitons la concorde et  la Paix universelle, car nous imaginons aisément les bienfaits qui s'étendront  sur la terre le jour OU les immenses ressources du genre humain ne seront plus  mises qu'au service du développement des peuples, au service du bonheur de
1 'humanité".
8.17 Mais hélas ! les appels lancés en faveur de la paix sont-ils écoutés ?  Le progrès scientifique, loin de nous apporter le bonheur que nous sommes en  droit d'attendre, ne risque-t-il pas de conduire 5 l'anéantissement du monde ?  L'armement reste la principale préoccupation des Etats, près de 800 milliards de  dollars des Etats-Unis lui sont consacrés chaque année dans le monde. Les moti-  vations sont multiples : il y a ceux qui veulent dominer le monde, il y a ceux  qui vivent du commerce des armes et, enfin, il y a ceux dont la sécurité n'est  pas suffisamment assurée et qui décident de s'armer malgré eux. Les conséquences  en sont graves. Les dépenses d'armement freinent le développement, encouragent  la violence, créent l'insécurité et instaurent la peur dans le monde entier. Le  Togo, qui abrite le Centre international pour la paix depuis bientôt deux ans,  dans le strict respect des principes et idéaux de sa politique étrangère,  continuera à apporter, inlassablement, son concours au plein succès du grand  programme XII1 sur la paix et les droits de l'homme.
8.18 Monsieur le Président, ma délégation a aussi examiné le Projet de budget  pour 1988-1989 qui lui a été soumis. Elle déplore les difficultés créées par les  fluctuations défavorables du taux de change entre le dollar et les diverses  monnaies, qui se répercutent sur la situation financière de notre Organisation.
561    cette situation est ressentie également dans les pays en voie de développement.  Dans ces conditions, nous suggérons que la priorité soit accordée à Certains  programmes. La délégation togolaise, dans ce cadre précis, appuie la majorité  des programmes prioritaires recommandés par le Conseil exécutif (programme 11.1,  grands programmes VI et XI, etc.).
8.19 Mais il va sans dire que la réussite de l'exécution de tous ces pro-  grammes dépend de la contribution positive de tous les Etats membres. Cela sup-  pose aussi le maintien du principe de l'universalité au sein de l'Unesco, prin-  cipe sur lequel l'organisation a toujours été fondée. C'est pourquoi le Gouver-  nement togolais, par ma voix, saisit ici l'occasion pour lancer un nouvel appel  aux Etats qui ont quitté l'Unesco, afin qu'ils reconsidèrent leur position. Nous  sommes convaincus que cet appel sera entendu et que bientôt, l'Unesco revêtira  son manteau de l'unité et de la concorde.
8.20 Enfin, pour terminer, permettez-moi de rendre ici encore, un vibrant  hommage au Directeur général de l'Unesco, M. Amadou-Mahtar M'Bon, dont la droi-  ture, le courage et l'intelligence forcent l'admiration. Nous formons le voeu  que la nouvelle direction générale qui prendra le relais dans quelques jours  sache tenir le cap, afin que les programmes qui seront exécutés par notre Orga-  nisation soient le reflet des aspirations profondes de la majorité la plus large  de ses membres et qu'elle trouve la sagesse et la dextérité nécessaires pour  consacrer l'essentiel de son énergie à la promotion de l'idéal de paix et de  progrès qui doit guider son action. Le destin de millions d'hommes et de femmes  qui placent un espoir légitime en notre Organisation en dépend. Je vous remercie.
(9) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Spanish):  I thank the head of the Togolese delegation for his statement and for  reading the message from the President of the Togolese Republic. Next, I invite  H.E. Mr Dzingai Mutwnbuka, Minister of Education, Chairman of the Zimbabwean  National Commission for Unesco and head of the delegation of Zimbabwe to take the  floor.
10.1 Mr MUTUMBUKA (Zimbabwe) :  Mr President of the General Conference, Mr Chairman of the Executive  Board, Mr Director-General, distinguished delegates, ladies and gentlemen, on  behalf of' the Zimbabwean delegation, allow me to congratulate you, Mr President,  on your election to the presidency of the twenty-fourth session of the General  Conference. We are confident that under your able leadership our deliberations  will be crowned with success.
10.2 Mr President, turning to the general policy debate, allow me to start my  intervention by making a few general observations about what is taking place in  our Organization. Since I came to Unesco a few days ago, I have heard a great  deal about the need for all of us to tighten our belts and to take a pragmatic  approach to our Organization's programmes. In various commissions, the mood is  âlready manifested in the number of draft resolutions which have as their main  theme the issue of programme concentration and cutbacks. It is the contention of  my delegation that if we are not careful we may lose the rationale of the  existence of our great Organization. We see the starting-point as being the  founding principles of Unesco. Thus in our attempt to be pragmatic and to seek  consensus we must link this exercise to the continuing search by Member States  for the most feasible means to make our Constitution fully operational.
10.3 The problems we have in our Organization, namely, the breakdown in the  consensus on the values inherent in our founding principles, cannot be resolved  by variations on the concept of pragmatism that are conceived outside the  framework of the principles and purposes of Unesco's Constitution. We may want to  ask ourselves whether it could be pragmatic for Unesco to sacrifice some of its  fundamental principles in order to gain acceptance and respectability. Would it  be in the interest of OUT Organization if we were to sacrifice some fundamental  principle of our Coiistitution in order to please the narrow interests of a given  pressure group?
10.4 Mr President, our Organization is as much the product of the Second  World War and other antecedent developments as it is of the imperial world order  whose essence it endeavoured to retain under conditions of peace. The Allied  Forces that emerged victorious from the Second World War also found themselves in  full possession of the means with which to impose a new status quo, a new code of
562    ethics, a new vision of peace through disarmament and, ultimately, a new order  which sought to universalize human rights and the rights to self-determination.  Indeed, never before in the history of warfare had victors sought to renounce the  very instruments that were responsible for their victory in favour of peace not  only for themselves but also for all nations and for all time.
10.5 Distinguished delegates, it is only by going back to the beginnings and  the Constitution of our Organization that we can assess clearly the direction  that we ought to take and the compromises we ought to be making. Some sacrifices  would render the dreams of the founding fathers of our organizations mere dross  and, as for the newly developed countries who yesterday only dreamt of peace, we  would find it difficult to let go of such dreams.
10.6 It is in this spirit, Mr President, that I make my contributions to the  general policy debate.
10.7 Zimbabwe welcomes the reform measures undertaken by the Executive Board  and by the Secretariat with a view to improving the functioning of our  Organization. But these reforms should not be regarded as temporary measures  reactive to the present problems facing the Organization but as a necessary and  ongoing process with a view to streamlining and rationalizing the heavy  bureaucratic structures of our Organization. As a leading international  organization, Unesco should lead in the process of renewal, revitalization and a  self-directed search for effectiveness. There is need to speed up the  decision-making process and the rate of programme delivery. Zimbabwe supports the  measures designed to improve the professional growth and the development of  staff.
10.8 Mr President, these reform measures including both effective interrial  and external evaluation procedures, greater financial control, clarity in  programme elaboration and rationalization of staff need to be strengthened in  order to make Unesco a vibrant international organization geared to fulfilling  its important mandate.
10.9 While Zimbabwe commends very highly all measures taken by the  Secretariat to adjust to new conditions in view of the budgetary constraints  caused by the withdrawal of some Member States, it is hoped that these cuts in  the resource base will not result in the sacrifice of projects considered useful  by the developing countries, such as Major Programmes I (Reflection on world  problems and future-oriented studies), XI (Culture and the future), XII (The  elimination of prejudice, intolerance, racism and apartheid), XII1 (Human rights  and the rights of peoples), XIV (The status of women) and also Major Programme II  (Education for all). The Zimbabwean delegation thus welcomes the due importance  still accorded to such programmes in the Draft Programme and Budget .for
10.10 Turning to specific items in the Draft Programme and Budget,  Mr President, Malor Programme II covering education for all and the struggle  against illiteracy is an important programme as it concentrates on the  development of the largely untapped human resources in all our countries,  particularly in developing countries. For us trom. the developing world, such  prograrrimes are of primary importance because, in order for our new nations to  forge a new dynamic cultural identity free of colonial and neo-colonial shackles,  ana for our peoples to participate in the wider world of culture, our people have  to be opened up to new vistas through the written word.
10.11 Mr President, we note with appreciation that the Draft Programme tries  to cover education for all at all levels in an endeavour to cater for lifelong  education. Thus, we support efforts aimed at providing suitable education for  disadvantaged groups such as the disabled, refugees and the rural poor. The  recent international conference held in Harare on the plight of children in South  Africa is a clear testimony of our strong belief and principled position on  providing' education for all, particularly the disadvantaged. Thus the Zimbabwe  delegation welcomes Major Programnie V (Education, training and society). In this  regard , Zimbabwe has taken steps to diversify its secondary education curriculum  with a view to preparing the youth for the world of work. The problem of  unemployed youth is of increasing concern to many developing countries, and it is  very important for us to link education to the world of work. Also related to  Major Programme V is the need for a strong scientific and technological base to  enable countries to share in the creation and exploitation of kncwledge. The  Zimbabwean delegation thus supports any programmes designed to share knowledge  and technology.
10.12 Turning specifically to science and technology, we note with concern the  new revolution in computers and informatics. Revolutionary advances in science  arid technology have ushered our world into the computer age, and it is clear that
563    this technology will demand new relationships within the family, within society  and among countries and nations. There is a serious danger that if Unesco does  not respond positively to this challenge, developing countries will continue to  lag further and further behind. Zimbabwe fully supports all efforts By Unesco to  eliminate existiny imbalances in the field of communication, to encourage a free  tlow and a wider and better balanced dissemination of information. The peaceful  use of computers and informatics needs to be underlined. It is hoped that Unesco  will continue to play its vital role in the implementation of Major  Progranmes III and VII.
10.13 Mr President, turning to Major Programme XI on culture aria the future,  we would want to commend Unesco for its work in support of cultural programmes in  Member States. In Zimbabwe our main task in the areas of cqlture has since the  attainment of our. independence been that of trying to destroy the cultural  retardation brought about by colonial domination over the last 90 years. Much  still needs to be done to nurture the development of a dynamic culture which cän  help our people to meet the challenges of an ever-changing world. Zimbabwe thus  supports the proposals to declare the years 1988-19.97 .the World Decade for  Cultural Development.
10.14 Mr President, I now turn to the question of human rights and the  struggle against apartheid and the struggle for women's rights. The fight for  equality of the sexes is a just struggle which in some societies is complicated  by cultural traditions. In Zimbabwe, the last seven years have witnessed great  social reform policies aimed at improving many underprivileged sections of our  society. Women have benefited greatly from these measures. The Ministry of  Community Development and Women's Affairs has the main responsibility for  mobilizing and'encouraging the various sectors in the economy to improve the  quality of life of the neglected masses with particular emphasis on women. Much  has been achieved in the following areas: women and education, there today being  a 50:tiO enrolment of boys anä girls in our schools; women and employment - some  legislative mea.sures aimed at improving the general working conditions for women  having been adopted, including the Minimum Wage Act, Equal Pay Regulations and  Maternity Leave with Pay; women and taxation - the government having decided to  introduce separate taxation for married couples, thereby doing away with the  discriminatory joint taxation system which placed heavy taxation on married  women. Much has also been done to enhance the status of women in agriculture and  health. Zimbabwe is proud that, politically and legally, huge steps have been  taken to eliminate discriminatioq against women. But it requires political will  to ensure that women take their rightful placb in society. Mr President, it is  not surprising therefore that Zimbabwe fuiiy supports measures proposed by Unesco  under Major Programme XïV to enhance the status of women during the forthcoming  biennium.
10.15 Coming to the issue of human rights and the struggle against apartheid  arid racism, there are no countries better qualified to talk about this evil than  those countries from southern Africa; and my colleagues from Angola and  Mozambique have already referred to this issue. Zimbabwe fully supports all  efforts by Unesco to reinforce resolution 39/114 of the United Nations General  Assembly in which the appropriate Specialized Agencies, as well as  intergovernmental and international non-governmental organizations, are called  upon to initiate measures against all totalitarian andlor other ideologies and  practices, including Fascism and ,apartheid, based on racial or ethnic  exclusiveness which deprive people of basic human rights and fundamental freedoms  and of equality of opportunity. Major Programme XII1 which deals with human  rights and the rights of people is particularly important, and we commend Unesco  for it5 efforts in this direction.
10.16 Mr President ãnd distinguished delegates, the South African racist  regime continues to intensify its destabilizing acts against the peace-loving  people of southern Africa. Our social and physical infrastructures are  continuously being dislocated by the banditry activities of the South African  racist regime. We appeal to the international community to condemn such naked and  unprovoked aggression.
10.17 Mr President, let me address myself to the issue of decentralization.  This is indeed a very serious matter. At the last General Conference in Sofia, we  made a decision for Unesco to decentralize its programes and activities. While  the statistics given by the Secretariat to show decentralized activities in the  Programme and Budget for 1986-1987 look impressive, I regret to say that we in  southern Africa have witnessed very little of it. Admittedly the Secretariat is  constrained by budgetary cuts, but we believe that more and more can and should  be done for our subregion given the peculiar situation and the diversity of our  cultures and education systems. It is in this context that Zimbabwe welcomes the  statement by the Director-General in his introductory statement to the general  policy debate in which he calls for fresh efforts to strengthen the Harare
564    Subregional Office for Southern Africa. For the past two years this Office has  been a one-man-show and threatens to remain so in the next biennium since the  Draft Programme and Budget for 1988-1989 makes no special provision for it.
10.18 Finally, Mr president and distinguished delegates, it is pleasing to  note that considefable and useful experience has been gained by Unesco operating  under changing circumstances. All this should assist in the formulation of the  third Medium-Term Plan. Zimbabwe)- has no objection to programme concentration as  long as this does not lead to the watering down of programmes. The activities  under the current Plan should therefore be carefully monitored to ensure that we  achieve what we have set out to do. There is need to strike a fair balance  between reflection and action.
10.19 Mr President, allow me to end my statement by paying a very special  tribute to the Director-General of Unesco, Mr Amadou-Mahtar N'Bow, for his rare  leadership qualities and for ably guiding Unesco through his two terms of office.  Mr M'Bow has done a lot for Unesco and I wish him tremendous success in his  future endeavours. Zimbabwe hopes that the new Director-General to be elected by  this twenty-fourth General Conference next week will be able to niaintain the  major programmes of the Organization and to improve upon the good work that has  already been started by Mr M'Bow and the Secretariat.
10.20 Considering Unesco is the only competent international organization in  the fields of education, science, social sciences, culture and communication,  Zimbabwe would like to appeal to the States which withdrew to rejoin this  Organization so that together we can face and overconie the universal problems  that confront mankind. I thank you, Mr President.
(11) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Spanish):  I thank the head of the Zimbabwean delegation and I invite H.E. Mrs Therese  Striggner Scott, Ambassador of Ghana to France, Permanent Delegate to Unesco and  head of the Ghanaian delegation to take the floor.
12.1 Mrs STRIGGNER-SCOTT (Ghana) :  Mr President, Mr Director-General, honourable ministers, distinguished  delegates, on behalf of the Ghanaian Gelegation and on my own behalf, I would  like to join my colleagues in congratulating H.E. Mr Putzeys Alvarez on, his  election to the presidency of this session of the General Conference of Unesco.  Mr President, your election is not only based on the trust which this Conference  has in your personal qualities, but also on the respect which it has in the  country which you represent. We have every reason to believe that under your wise  and able guidance the deliberations of this Conference will proceed in an  atmosphere of calm and serenity.
12.2 Mr President, the twenty-fourth session of the General Conference  closely follows the celebration of the fortieth anniversary of the founding of  Unesco. In our culture, 40 years or 40 days is very significant. In other  cultures life begins at 40, because 40 years signifies maturity. While it would  take precious time to catalogue some of the achievements of the Organization,  suffice it to say that the past 40 years have seen Unesco's role as an organ of  multilateral co-operation, for advancing the object-ives of peace and the common  welfare of mankind. I therefore wish to call upon all those who have the interest  and welfare of Unesco at heart to employ their wealth, wisdom and energy to  construct and not to destroy this irreplaceable Organization.
12.3 Mr President, one of the most important items on the agenda of the  General Conference is the consideration and approval of the Draft Programme and  Budget for 1988-1989. Its importance lies in the fact that it represents the  final stage in the execution of the second Medium-Term Plan anã the beginning of  the third Medium-Term Plan, or to quote the woràs of the Director-General 'a  coiiclusion and an opening on the future'.
12.4 Mr President, for lack of sufficient time and in view of the fact that  we shall have the opportunity to examine the Draft Programme and Budget in detail  in the programme commissions, I would like to restrict myself to some general  remarks.
12.5 My delegation is pleased to observe that the lessons drawn from the  preparation of document 23 C/5 have been taken into consideration and the
565    document 24 C/5 has been published in two volumes, a format which facilitates its  examination. We also note with satisfaction that concentration of programmes has  been carried further without affecting the thrust nor the objectives of the  Medium-Term Plan. I would, therefore, like to join other distinguished delegates  in commending the Director-General and his staff for all their efforts in the  preparation of this document.
12.6 Mr President, having said that, my delegation is of the view that  programme concentration should not be limited to subprogrammes. Indeed there is  room for some degree of concentration of programmes and major programmes to  correspond to the main functions which constitute Unesco's objectives.
12.7 Mr President, the universalization and renewal of primary education and  the eradication of illiteracy is a major preoccupation of the developing  countries of which my country, Ghana, is one. At the recent 10th Conference of  Cormonwealth Education Ministers in Nairobi, in July of this year, the Ministers  recognized that, despite marked expansion in provision of educational  opportunities in most countries, many forces still continue to create an  imbalance between educational systems and the world of work. Relating this to  Ghana, our latest census reveals that the youth form about 30 per cent of the  population of nearly 14 million. Out of this, only about 7 per cent of the  eligible age-group enter secondary school. Mr President, since youth are the  latest to be employed, it iollows that illiteracy among youth, especially in  developing countries, for the years ahead is going to have far-reaching  implications. Acknowledging this situation, we in Ghana are introducing, as from  this academic year, a new educational structure, the aim of which is to chänge  the content and objectives of education at all levels so as to strike a careful  balance between the purely academic and the technical and vocaticjnal elements of  the curriculum.
12.8 Mr President, education, which falls within a high priority area of  Unesco's field of competence, is spread across three main major programmes,  namely Major Programmes II, IV and V. However, notwithstanding the slight  increase in resources allocated to Programme 11.1, it is regretted that Major  Programme II does not receive the greater allocation of resources that it  deserves. My delegation therefore laments this budgetary stagflation as rather  unfortunate since the programme covers an important area where national  facilities need extensive rehabilitation as well as significant expansion,  particularly in the developing countries. In this connection, my delegation hopes  that the appropriate sections of Major Programme II would be strengthened and  reinforced by the transfer of resources from related major programmes.
12.9 Mr President, it is high time that we in the developing countries began  to broaden our iields of operation to gain a fair share of the global information  and communication order. The general .thrust of activities concerned with  communication issues is very satisfactory and responds to the needs and  aspirations of developing countries. My delegation is pleased to note that  reasonable provision has been made for the development of research. With the  introduction of new coxtmunication technologies, it has become necessary to study  what socio-cultural impact they have made and what potential there is for using  these new technologies for the ends of development. The attention paid to  training and the development of communication infrastructures, as well as  endogenous production of messages and programmes, also deserve full commendation  by developing countries which stand to benefit directly from the proposed  actions.
12.10 On training facilities, I would like to inform distinguished delegates  that Ghana has three such institutions, which complement each other, namely the  School of Communication Studies which of fers postgraduate-level courses at the  University of Ghana; the Ghana Institute of Journalism and the National Film and  Television Institute, otherwise known as NAFTI. In the light of our plans to  extend NAFTI's facilities to other countries of the region, for which it has  already obtained some modest support from IPDC, my deleqation would like to  express its keen interest in the activities concerned with the development of  training institutions, programmes and materials. We hope the Director-General  will be able to obtain the necessary assistance to supplement our efforts to  traiisform NAFTI into a regional training institute of high quality.
12.11 Mr President, my delegation is on record as having over the years  supported Unesco's programmes on the natural and applied sciences under Major  Programmes VI, IX and X. My delegation once again supports these major programmes  and the activities to be carried out under them in the 1988-1989 biennium.
12.12 My delegation notes with satisfaction Unesco's response to OAU's request  for a Special Programme of Assistance in the Field of Scientific and  Technological Research and Development in support of Africa's Priority Programme
566    for Economic Recovery. This programme has been duly prepared and was presented to  the second Conference of Ministers Responsible for the Application of Science and  Technology to Development in Africa at Arusha in July this year. It is my  delegation's hope that the measures proposed to implement this programme will  remove the constraints that stood in the way of implementing the recommendations  of the first conference held in 1974.
12.13 Mr President, it will be necessary to bear in mind always that the main  thrust of 'the endeavours of international organizations such as Unesco should be  to assist Member States, especiallly the developing ones, to reach the point  where they can solve their own problems of development. The activities under  Major Programme VIII, which are all geared towards development strategies, are  thus of significance to development planning in Ghana, particularly at this time  when our emphasis is on decentralization and rural development. To this end, I am  pleased to inform you that niy government would be willing to host one of the  regional training seminars proposed for planners and administrators responsible  for development projects.
12.i4 Mr President, we see all the activities spelt out under Major Pro-  gramme XI (Culture and the future) as contributing directly to the launching and  implementation of the World Decade for Cultural Development by Unesco, and this  may explain why it surfaces in all the 14 major programmes. As the only inter-  national organization within whose sphere of competence culture falls, Unesco  will be called upon to play a central role in the implementation of the proposed  Plan of Action for the Decade. My delegation therefore is happy to note the  increased priority given to activities under this major programme.
12.15 Mr President, my delegation gives full support to programmes,  subprogrammes and activities proposed under Major Programmes XII and XIII. It is  worthy of note that most of the activities listed under Programme XII.3 (The  struggle against apartheid), are geared towards studies on apartheid. Studies of  such issues as the concept of the right of peoples and the relationship between  the rights of peoples and human rights would prove a great help to Unesco and  other international agencies, as discussions of these terms usually provoke a lot  of emotional outbursts.
12.16 Having said that, my delegation would like to put forward a suggestion  by way of eiisuring effective programme implementation, that suggestion being that.  perhaps greater emphasis should be placed on regional and subregional workshops  and seminars for teachers and other workers who are directly engaged in the task  of disseminating ideas and promoting understanding among their peoples for the  purposes of eliminating prejudice , intolerance, racism and apartheid. Under the  circumstances, we would like to see co-operation with national liberation  movements recognized by OAU strengthened.
12.17 Mr President, at this juncture I would like to make a brief observation  about the status of women which is dealt with under Major Programme XIV. Although  there is no law that allows discrimination against women, in practical terms the  female still has a relatively low status in society. We would like to see changes  here if true progress is to come to the whole of society. My delegation therefore  welcomes and supports the series of activities in the fields of education and  literacy training proposed under this major programme and other related  programmes. It is also the hope of my delegation that every effort will be made  to implement the 'Nairobi Forward-looking Strategies for the Advancement of  Women' adopted by the World Conference to Review and Appraise the Achievements of  the United Nations Decade for Women (Nairobi, 1985) for which we are happy to  note, provision has been made under this major programme.
12.18 Mr President, as the saying goes, charity begins at home. One would  therefore expect the Unesco Secretariat to show a marked improvement in the  representation of women on the staff of the Secretariat. It will be recalled  that, during the extraordinary session in 1982, the leader of the Ghanaian  delegation appealed to the Conference to ensure that a fair percentage of high  office went to ladies. This, however, has not been the case. At the beginning of  this Conference, one saw a disappointingly sparse female representation on the  dais. Indeed, there has been a slight decrease in the number of women holding  professional posts in the Secretariat. My delegation would like to see a drive  for the recruitment of the fair sex to rectify the situation.
12.19 Mr President, another equally important item on the agenda of this  Conference is the third Medium-Term Plan. My delegation appreciates the  initiatives taken by the Director-General to set in motion the process of  elaborating the third Medium-Term Plan, as set out by the General Conference in
23 C/Resolution 48. The National Commissions are already engaged in active  discussions and exchanges of views on the third Medium-Term Plan. The current  session of the General Conference also of fers Member States another opportunity
567    to exchange views and consult with one another. In short, we are happy to note  that the third Medium-Term Plan will have been the subject of, wide-ranging  discussion before its final elaboration and formulation.
12.20 Mr President, the appointment of a new Director-General for our  Organization is, without doubt, one of the important items on the agenda of this  session. The founding fathers of Unesco had a noble vision to create our  Organization which inspires the world towards peace, international co-operation  and the common prosperity and well-being of mankind. In order to achieve this  noble objective, we should, in our deliberations, search for the larger common  grounds which united Member States and not the smaller divisive elements. It will  therefore be the unenviable responsibility of the next Director-General not only  to isentify the larger common grounds which unite Member States but also to  contain and control coriflict and confrontation among Member States, remembering  that at the meeting in Nairobi in 1976 an overriding concern to preserve the  unity of the Organization was shared by all.
12.21 Mr President, I would like to make an appeal to Member States that,  after the votes are cast and counted, please let us remenììer to respect and abiüe  by the decision of the majority. For it is not our individual interests but the  interests of Unesco that in the long term must prevail.
12.22 My delegation is without a doubt aware of the concrete contributions the  incumbent Director-General has made to our noble Organization, and particularly  to developing countries such as mine. That is a fact that neither my delegation,  nor I believe others, can afford to overlook. With selflessness he has devoted  well-needed attention to the numerous problems facing these countries and in his  tireless manner has employed efforts to ensure that assistance is not denied.  >12.23 In conclusion, the Ghanaian delegation hopes that this concern would  help us during and after this Conference to lay more stress on the ties that bind  us together as members of this Organization than on a few issues that have  already divided and will continue to divide us. Thank you, Mr President.
(13) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Spanish):  I thank the head of the Ghanaian delegation for her statement.  H.E. Mr Othello Gongar, Minister of Education and head of the delegation of Liberia  now has the floor.
14.1 Mr GONGAR (Liberia) :  Mr President of the Conference, Mr Chairman of the Executive Board,  Mr Director-General, distinguished delegates, ladies and gentlemen, it is indeed  with great pride and dignity that I bring you warm wishes and felicitations from  the President, the Government and the people of the Republic of Liberia. As one  of the oldest members of this Organization, we want emphatically to reaffirm our  commitment to the purpose of this Organization, established some 41 years aga.  Stated in part: the purpose of Unesco is to contribute to peace and security by  prbmoting collaboration among the nations through education, science and culture  in order to further universal respect for justice, for the rule of law and for  the human rights and fundamental freedoms which are affirmed for the peoples of  the world, without distinction of race, sex, language or religion, by the Charter  of the United Nations.
14.2 Mr President, permit us to extend, on behalf of our delegation and the  Governmerit and people of Liberia, our congratulations to you on your election as  President of this august assembly. We are convinced that the success of this  Conference is assured through your able leadership.
14.3 Mr President, the last Executive Board meeting can be considered as one  of the most crucial in the annals of this Organization. Apparent divisions in the  attempt tu nominate a new Director-General for the Organization attest to the  fact that the Organization has serious problems which must not be underestimated.  It is clear to us that ideological differences which constitute the major cause  of global conflicts are now deeply entrenched in this Organization with the aim  of äiverting it from its normal course. In the face of this serious problem, the  task of the incumbent Director-General has not been an easy one. My government  notes with a high degree of appreciation the perspicacity and competence with  which he has managed the affairs of the Organization.
14.4 To him we say: walk proudly amongst men with your head held high for you  have not only represented Senegal well but the continent of Africa. As we  consider the appointment of a successor to this giant amongst men, my government  would like us to elect someone who will ensure that the Organization is kept on  an even keel and not distracted or sidetracked into furthering any particular  nation's, sector's or region's wishes. He must be one who is committed to the  furtherance of the aims and objectives of Unesco. The challenge of the one  appointed is to chart a broad new course for the Organization, taking a cue from  the enviable footprints left behind by his predecessor.
14.5 As Unesco continues to move forward, it is very important that its  collaborative programme with the World Bank be encouraged to grow in strength and  importance. We in Liberia view this collaboration as a marriage of research and  implementation of research f iridings. Similar relationships with the African  Development Bank and other regional banks should be encouraged and liaison  established and maintained with them.
14.6 While this Organization has served as a forum for the exchange of  knowledge, the promotion and maintenance of international peace and security in  keeping with its founding principles and in accordance with its Constitution, the  diversified political orientations of States and peoples continues to encourage  the advancement of fundamental differences among peoples to a pinnacle of  prominence which in some cases has culminated in conflicts.
14.7 Mr President, global peace and international understanding are no longer  assured. The peace so cherished by all mankind after the Great Wars appears to be  eluding mankind.
14.8 The armed conflicts in Africa, Asia, the Middle East, South-East Asia  and Latin America, the devastating hostilities between the belligerent natioris of  the Gulf and, worst of all, the sad prospect of a nuclear holocaust are  attestations to the non-existence of genuine peace.
14.9 Mr President, Unesco is currently going through a rather exceptional  period. Despite the work-load involved in the fulfilment of the resolutions  adopted at the twenty-third session of the General Conference in Sofia, Bulgaria,  in 1985, the Organization's ability to plan and host this General Conference  session is highly commendable. On the other hand, Mr President, the Organization  has witnessed the withdrawal of two more Member States since the last General  Conference session. The withdrawal ot any Member State, be it great or small,  detracts from the universality of the Organization. Mr President , my government  would like this Conference to undertake a sober reflection on the consequences of  the withdrawal of Member States and believes that it must resolve to adopt  concrete actions not only to curtail threats of withdrawal but to reawaken the  interest of the members that have withdrawn.
14.10 Our review of the Draft Programme and Budget for 1988-1989 has led us to  the conclusion that the budget was indeed prepared on the basis of the approved  Medium-Term Pian.
14.11 The Government of Liberia strongly supports the Regional Programme for  the Eradication of Illiteracy in Africa and the activities for the development  and renewal of primary education. I would like to commend Unesco for the  financial and technical support extended to the Government and people of Liberia  in its endeavours to combat illiteracy during this biennium. We were proud to  host a regional seminar on population education with emphasis on the case of  school health education for trainers of primary-school teachers.
14.12 In line with our support for Programme 11.5 (Development of education in  rural areas), our educational system is currently undergoing a series of reforms.  These include but dre not limited to: implementation of a compulsory school  attendance law for all children of school age; construction of regional education  centres; implementation of programmed learning and programmed teaching  methodologies; creation of separate arms of the Ministry of Education for  primary, secondary and teacher education, etc. The aim is to ensure that  education reaches the majority of our population with particular emphasis on the  rural areas.
14.13 Mr President, press freedom is now a reality in Liberia. My government's  support for Major Programme III (Communication in the service of man) is  exemplified by the existence of three radio stations and seven daily newspapers  privately owned. The three rural radio stations owned and operated by the State  feature on a daily basis development-oriented programmes in the areas of agri-  culture, education and health. It is in this light that my government was a proud  host to a regional conference for communication policy-makers as well as a  regional conference for journalists of the region. The government expresses its
569    thanks to Unesco for its assistance in establishing, at the University of  Liberia, a School of Journalism to serve The Gambia, Sierra Leone and the host  country Liberia.
14.14 Mr President, considering my government's support for Major Programme VI  (The sciences and their application to development) , we believe that there must  be an interrelationship between the social sciences and the natural sciences to  assure development, especially in developing countries. Sociologists must work  alongside biologists and chemists in the promotion of the use of biq-gas  technology.
14.15 The intent of all science is to bring relief to the suffering people of  the world. A major breakthrough in the development of new technology in the  natural sciences would have its desired effect only if the benefits were clearly  outlined to the target group by a social scientist.
14.16 Mr President, distinguished delegates, it can no longer be saia that  'nature is the mother of invention'. Space science and technology should now be  devoted to the study of the earth and its resources. The space-faring nations of  the world should give more attention to events on planet earth rather than  dreaming of interplanetary voyages. Journeys to planet Mars or other planets by  space vehicles make no contribution to the solution of problems posed by natural  hazards on earth. Space science and technology should be devoid of militarism.  For we believe, Mr President, that mankind should not seek to resolve differences  created on earth in outer space. If man has a problem on the ground, he must sit  down on the ground to settle his problem.
14.17 If the developed nations of the world desire peace and limited loss of  life and property as a consequence of natural disasters, enough resources nust be  directed towards the study of natural hazard predictions relating to events of  both geological and hydro-meteorological origin.
14.18 Among the greatest enemies of man in contemporary society is the danger  posed by earthquakes, volcanic eruptions, landslides, cyclones, tornadoes,  hurricanes, drought, floods and the eruption of poisonous gases from lake beds.  We feel that adeqiiate trained human resources should be committed to  Programme X.2.
14.19 Mr President, Liberia's support for Major Programme XII1 (The elimi-  riation of prejudice, intolerance, racism and apartheid) , is unquestionable.  Liberia was conceived as a nation for circumstances emanating from.racia1 biases  against the freedom of colour.
14.20 The concept of the unity of mankind despite race, colour, creed and sex  should not be confined to research and seminar-oriented endeavours. Since today's  children must grow up into tomorrow's adults, could not an essay competition on  the theme, 'children of the world against racism and apartheid' be organized and  encouraged by the United Nations? An arts competition and exhibition depicting  the evils of racism and apartheid should be conducted as an annual event for  primary-school pupils with Unesco's support. The great nations of the world must  continue to reflect Gn the cause of the last great world war. Let me remind the  Conference, Mr President, that the best rhetorics against apartheid have been  spoken, the most excellent discussions against apartheid, the greatest intentions  for its abolition have been advanced; all we can add is that apartheid is equal  to slavery and that those who continue to support it are hypocrites. k vigorous  campaign against apartheid and racism should be reflected in schools, cultural  and scientific institutions and in the mass media in fulfilment of resolu-  tion 39/114 of the United Nations General Assembly.
14.21 Mr President, the maintenance of peace and international understanding  is of prominent importance to the Republic of Liberia. Recalling resolution 13.1  adopted by the General Conference at its twenty-third session, our government  strongly supports Unesco's effort for the promotion of peace, internatiorial  understanding, human rights and the rights of people.
14.22 We come from varying cultural backgrounds: at Unesco we resolve to  preserve the culture and historic relics of mankind. We come from countries with  different educational systems and levels of illiteracy; at Unescd we vow to  collectively combat illiteracy and improve educational systems to ensure that the  mass of the world population is given an education. We come from countries with  varying concepts of human rights; at Unesco we pledge our resources to the  guaranteeing of the rights of the human race. We come from countries with varying  degrees and interpretations of press freedom; at Unesco we strive for the free  flow of information and unflinchingly support mass communication. This is the  universality of approach to problem-solving of which we speak, and to which my  government is fully committed.
14.23 In closing therefore, Mr President, let me, at the risk of being  repetitious, reaffirm the continued support of the Government and people of  Liberia for Unescd, its founding principles and its aims and aspirations. We call  on this august body to maintain the nature of the Organization and vigorously  strive to keep its universality. I thank you.
(15) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Spanish):  I thank the head of the Liberian delegation for his statement and I invite  H.E. Mr Cyril Walker, Minister of State, Minister of Education and Culture of  Barbados and head of the delegation of Barbados, to take the floor.
16.1 Mr WALKER (Barbados) :  Mr President, Mr Chairman of the Executive Board, Mr Director-General,  Excellencies, distinguished delegates, ladies and gentlemen, I would like to join  my colleagues who have spoken before me in congratulating you, Mr President, on  your well-deserved election. Your efficient and expeditious guidance of the  Conference so far is testimony to the wisaom of our choice.
16.2 It is indeed an honour to be afforded the opportunity in this august  chamber to convey to you, Mr President, and to the General Conference the warm  greetings and best wishes of the Government and people of Barbados.
16.3 It would certainly be remiss of me if I did not register the appre-  ciation of the Barbados delegation to the Director-General and his hardworking  staff for having prepared and submitted in good time a comprehensive and clear  document in the form of the Draft Programme and Budget for the biennium
1988-1989. Hy äelegation welcomes the presentation of this document in two  volumes. Volume I is quite useful in providing a quick picture of the general  policy and main lines of the programes. We fully appreciate the Secretariat's  sterling efforts not only in producing the Draft Programme and Budget but also  the other well prepared support documents. These will contribute to the  realization of the goals for the final biennium in the current Medium-Term Plan.
16.4 Mr President, I shall now direct my attention to the areas of the Draft  Progranme and Budget which are of greatest importance to my country. Major  Programme I, which concerns world problems and future-oriented studies, is  supported in principle. My delegation considers it important that greater  emphasis should be placed oil the study of the abuse of drugs, which is plaguing  the youth of the world. In addition, increased attention could perhaps be also  given to the problems of indebtedness which confront the developing world and  contribute to the widening gap between the North and South.
16.5 Mr President, Barbados has always placed great emphasis on the education  and training of its people. In fact, the Education Sector receives the largest  portion of my country's budget, since we perceive people as the nation's greatest  resource, and the quality of this resource depends, in large measure, on the  quality of education. Of course, the quality of education, in turn, depends on  the structure, content and management of education. It is because of the high  inportance which Barbados attaches to this field that my delegation finds  considerable ease in supporting most of the programmes relating thereto. Major  Programme II, which deals with education for all, meshes neatly with the stated  policy in Barbados to continue with a course of free education from early  childhood education up to and including university level.
16.6 Mr President, Barbados will continue to participate in the laudable  effort to achieve the objectives of the Major Project in the Field of Education  in Latin America and the Caribbean. The Member States of the region, in 1982, had  agreed that the Caribbean Network for Education Innovation for Development  (CARNEID) should be a mechanism through which the objectives of the Major Project  should be realized. Accordingly, we sincerely hope that CARNEID will receive  adequate support to enable it to achieve this task.
16.7 Mr President, a sound and well-functioning educational system depends in  large measure on a well-conceived and efficiently applied educational policy.  Accordingly, my delegation supports the planned activities. of Major Programme IV,  which deals specifically with the formulation and application of education  policies. In particular, we in Barbados support Subprogramme IV.1.2, which  addresses the improvement of educational planning, administration and management.  My government has recently concluded an agreement with the World Bank and the  Inter-American Development Bank which will assist my country with the imple-
571    mentation of the Second Education and Training Project. A considerable portion of  the funds in this project will be channelled into the human resource development  of the central administration.of the Ministry of Education and Culture.
16.8 The delegation of Barbados also supports Major Programme V, which deals  with education, training and society. The Government of Barbados considers that  the education and training system is a powerful instrument for change in the  economic, social .and cultural progress of society. The linkage of'education and  training with the economy gives education special significance as a major  catalyst in enabling the country to achieve its development goals. Training and  retraining of teachers therefore, remain priority areas in Barbados. The  government is currently taking the appropriate steps to redirect secondary  education to render it more appropriate to the requirements of a highly tech-  nological world. My delegation accordingly supports Subprogramme V.2.1, which  deals with the development of the teaching of science and technology in the  school. This subprogramme is particularly important, since the application of  scientific and appropriate technological knowledge can make the difference  between development and underdevelopment.
16.9 While on the subject of development, my delegation wishes to associate  itself with the objectives of Major Programme VIII, which deals with principles,  methods and strategies of action for development. It is noted that Major  Programme VI11 is interdisciplinary in content and will be intersectoral in its  implementation. Major Programme VI11 therefore appears to provide the required  flexibility to enable Unesco and Member States from both the developed and  developing world to co-operate in identifying projects and implementation for  development. Barbados eagerly looks forward to participating in the planned  activities of Major Programme VIII.
16.10 Mr President, I shall now focus attention on Major Programmes VI (The  sciences and their application to development) and IX (Science, technology and  society). My delegation would be glad to see greater emphasis on assisting  developing countries to improve their science base. In this era, science and  technology have 3 pivotal role to play in the developmental process of these  countries.
16.11 Mr President, it is now my wish to direct attention to the proposed  activities of Unesco under Major Programme XI (Culture and the future). We  recognize and appreciate the very important work which Unesco has done and is  still doing, for indeed in the current biennium, the Barbados-based Caribbean  Conservation Association has received financial assistance from Unesco for the  implementation of two of its projects in the field of culture.
16.12 The Government of Barbados is fully committed to assisting with a  programme of dynamic cultural development for all Barbadians and projecting the  true picture of our heritage. As such, my delegation therelfore can generally  endorse Major Programme XI, since the Organization's activities are geared to the  projection and promotion of the diverse cultures of the world.
16.13 In particular, Mr President, my delegation wishes to endorse the planned  activity concerning the training of specialists in conservation. The Caribbean at  present lacks expertise in this area and would therefore anticipate participating  in this programme.
16.14 Mr President, my delegation also endorses the proposal for the increased  financial contribution to the major programme on culture, especially since the  proclamation of the World Decade for Cultural Development will certainly call for  increased funds so that the four stated objectives of the Decade may be realized.  However, we note with some disappointment that no reference or provision is made  to support the Caribbean Festival of Creative Arts (CARIFESTA). We accord high  importance to this festival since it brings together people of the Caribbean with  different languages and cultures and allows them to share varying experiences  through the media of dance, song, drama, poetry and the other performing arts.
16.15 Mr President, we can associate ourselves with the objectives of Major  Programmes III (Communication in the service of man) and VI1 (Information systems  and access to knowledge). hbove all, we fully appreciate the assistance which the  developing Member States reczive from the International Programme for the  Development of Communication. Inäeed, we acknowledge with thanks that the  Caribbean Broadcasting Corporation and the Caribbean News Agency have both  benefited from such financial assistance. CANA'S success as a news service can be  measured by the fact that the OAS uses its copy as a basis of a daily news  bulletin on the region for distribution among missions accredited to that  organization.
16.16 Mr President, my delegation firmly believes that Unesco has a positive  role to play in improving the flow of information from the South to the North and
572    among nations within the South. In addition, it is also clear that Unesco will  have to play an ever-increasing role in facilitating the process by which the  people of the developing world will gain improvea access to knowledge. It is  therefore to be hoped that increased funding can be found for activities falling  within these two major programmes.
16.17 Mr President, the Participation Programme continues to be an important  source of funding for the realization of national and regionäl projects. We  regret that it has not been possible to increase the allocation for the  programme.
16.18 Mr President, my delegation recognizes that the Director-General has  made some progress towards the achievement of the general decentralization of the  Organization's resources ana activities. However, it is considered that the  decentralization process would be advanced if Unesco responded favourably to the  resolution adopted at the twenty-second session of the General Conference which  called for the decentralization of resources to the Office of the Unesco  Representative to the Caribbean. In particular, my delegation hopes that, in  consonance with that resolution, every effort will be made to ensure that the  breakdown of resources allocated to our region reflects the amount allocated to  the Caribbean Office as well as that allocated to the other Unesco Offices in  Santiago, Montevideo, Havana and Caracas.
16.19 Although it is not our view that 'mini-Unescos' should be established  throughout the world, my delegation still firmly believes that decentralization  carries the advantage of bringing the Organization closer to the pulse of Member  States. We believe that this interaction would benefit both the Organization and  Member States. We therefore urge that the Office of the Unesco Representative to  the Caribbean be permitted to grow and to experience the required anount of  autonomy necessary to serve the special needs of the subregion.
16.20 Mr President, I should like to state that the Government of Barbados is  committed to the principle of multilateralism and will continue to give  unswerving support to the preservation of the United Nations system, of which  Unesco is a valued and important agency. Multilateralism provides small States  with the opportunity to have their voices heard in international forums and to  make their contributions on the basis of principle to the maintenance of a  civilized international order.
16.21 While on the subject of multilateralism, my delegation wishes to urge  former Member States to return to Unesco and let us all intensify our collective  efforts towards the fulfilment of the Organization's goals and objectives.  Furthermore , Mr President , my delegation is convinced that Member States. could  more easily achieve any desired reform in the Organization by remaining within  the family. Non-Member States, however powerful, will find it more difficult to  influence the direction in which this important Specialized Agency should go. By  the same token and for the same reasons we hope that any Member States that might  be considering withdrawal would reassess their positions.
16.22 Before closing, Mr President, I wish to express my delegation's  appreciation of the Director-General's dedicated service. Mr M'Bow has set a  standard in terms of service to the developing countries in general, and  definitely to our subregion.
16.23 Mr President, I am sure that, under your expert and skilful guidance,  and with the wise counsel of the Director-General, this twenty-fourth session  will be a very successful General Conference session and that the Organization  will continue to grow from strength to strength. Thank you, Mr President.
(17) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Spanish):  I thank the head of the delegation of Barbados for his statement and I now  invite Mrs Marie-Thérèse Avemeka, Permanent Representative to Unesco of the Women's  International Democratic Federation to take the floor.
18.1 Mme AVEMEKA (Fédération démocratique internationale des femmes) :  Monsieur le Président de la Conférence générale, Monsieur le Président  du Conseil exécutif, Monsieur le Directeur général, honorables délégués, Mesdames  et Messieurs, la Fédération démocratique internationale des femmes saisit cette  occasion pour renouveler à l'Unesco et à son Directeur général, M. Amadou-Mahtar  M'Bow, sa profonde gratitude pour avoir toujours accordé toute leur place aux ONG
573    dans la coopération fructueuse qui s'est instaurée tout au long de ces années  entre elles et l'organisation. L'association constante de la communauté des ONG  ? la préparation comme à l'application des programmes de l'Unesco, aura contribué  a la participation, plus que jamais nécessaire, des peuples au succès de  l'Unesco. Elle constitue en même temps un gage de l'intérêt réel que l'organisa-  tion prête à sa coopération avec les ONG en ce qu'elles représentent l'opinion  publique de la façon la plus large. A cet égard, nous saluons les efforts cons-  tants que le Directeur général de l'Unesco déploie en vue de renforcer cette  coopération.
18.2 Pour sa part, la Fédération démocratique internationale des femmes a  toujours su apprécier à sa juste valeur l'importance d'une approche qui tend à  intégrer les femmes dans la planification et la réalisation des tâches inscrites  dans les programnies de l'Unesco. Toutefois, une des conditions fondamentales  pour que soient utilisées au mieux les possibilités qui existent de mettre en  oeuvre une telle démarche est qu'un contact permanent soit établi entre les  organisations féminines et les commissions nationales de l'Unesco. En effet, ces  organisations pourraient ainsi prendre plus facilement connaissance des documents  et publications de l'Unesco sur les problèmes des femmes et localiser les  domaines oii une coopération conforme aux priorités nationales est possible. On  sait que c'est la vigilance au niveau national qui assure une base solide à la  confiance et à l'esprit de coopération entre l'Unesco et les organisations au  niveau international.
18.3 Les activités menées par l'Unesco en vue de contribuer à l'amélioration  de la condition des femmes sont notoirement en progrès, malgré les restrictions  budgétaires du moment. Ces efforts attestent l'intérêt toujours grandissant que  l'organisation prête à l'action à mener afin que les femmes et les hommes de ce  monde participent sur un pied d'égalité, en tant qu'agents et bénéficiaires, aux  processus sociaux, culturels, économiques et politiques du développement.
18.4 Ces activités sont au coeur même du programme de la Fédération démocra-  tique internationale des femmes qui, depuis sa création en 1945, oeuvre inlassa-  blement en vue de la réalisation de ses nobles idéaux à savoir : la conquête,  l'application et la defense des droits des femmes en tant que meres, travail-  leuses et citoyennes, la défense des droits de tous les enfants du monde & la  vie, au bien-être et à l'instruction, la conquête et la sauvegarde de l'indépen-  dance nationale et des libertés démocratiques, pour la liquidation de l'apar-  theid, de la discrimination raciale et du fascisme, enfin la paix et le désarme-  ment universel.
18.5 Monsieur le Président, les stratégies prospectives d'action de Nairobi  pour la promotion de la femme ont su parfaitement lier les trois thèmes de la  Décennie des Nations Unies pour la femme : égalité, développement et paix. Aussi  l'Unesco a-t-elle pu orienter son action dans chacun de ces trois domaines grâce  à la recherche et aux activités opérationnelles. Ces activités visent à identi-  fier toute forme de discrimination fondee sur le sexe qui pourrait être pratiquée  dans les domaines de compétence de l'Unesco : l'éducation, la science, la culture  et la communication.
18.6 L'objectif est double. D'une part, il faut identifier les différentes  formes de discrimination et d'inégalité qui touchent les femmes, les mécanismes  qui les engendrent et les conséquences qui en découlent, pour les femmes et pour  la société elle-même ; d'autre part, il s'agit de formuler des stratégies qui  facilitent la mise en oeuvre efficace des droits fondamentaux des femmes et de  l'égalité des chances dans les domaines de compétence de l'Unesco.
18.7 En vue de promouvoir l'égalité entre les hommes et les femmes, l'Unesco  a mis un accent particulier sur l'application des instruments internationaux,  tout en indiquant les obstacles auxquels on a pu faire face. I1 s'agit notamment  de la Convention et de la Recommandation concernant la lutte contre la discrimi-  nation dans le domaine de l'enseignement, de la Recommandation concernant la  condition du personnel enseignant, de la Recommandation révisée concernact  l'enseignement technique et professionnel, de la Recommandation sur le dévelop-  pement de l'éducation des adultes, enfin et surtout, de la Convention sur l'éli-  mination de toutes les formes de discrimination à l'égard des femmes. I1 faut  malheureusement reconnaître que les Etats membres n'ont pas encore tous signé et  ratifié les deux conventions citées. Nous en appelons à l'Unesco pour qu'elle  renforce son action de sensibilisation des Etats en faveur de la ratification de  ces conventions et de leur mise en application.
18.8 Monsieur le Président, les femmes constituent dans le monde nettement  plus de la moitié de la population. L'importance de leur contribution au proces-  sus de développement n'est plus à démontrer ; elle en est la condition sine qua  non. L'Unesco devra par conséquent renforcer son action en vue de la réduction  des inégalités en matière d'éducation et de formation, base de toute politique
17  visant l'intégration des femmes au processus de développement. Dans les pays du  tiers monde, la participation des femmes au développement de leur pays reste  marginale, faute d'insertion de leur part dans les systèmes socio-éducatifs,  surtout dans les zones rurales. Quant au rôle des femmes dans le renforcement de  Sa paix, il est au coeur même des stratégies de Nairobi. En effet, sans la paix,  il n'y a pas de développement, et sans développement, il n'y a pas de promotion  de la femme. Les énormes richesses englouties dans les armements suffiraient  amplement 6 pourvoir au développement de toutes les nations et, partant, à la  promotion féminine.
18.9 La Fédération démocratique internationale des femmes a toujours su lier  dans ses activités le problème de la paix à celui du développement et aux droits  des femmes. A titre d'exemple, elle a convoqué au mois de juin dernier 6 Moscou,  un Congrès mondial des femmes qui a eu pour thème "En avant vers l'an 2000, sans  armes nucléaires, pour la paix, l'égalité et le développement". Ce congrès, qui  a réuni pres de trois mille femmes de toutes les parties du monde, de toutes les  tendances politiques et d'origines sociales différentes, a connu un succès écla-  tant, tant par les échanges qui ont pu avoir lieu que par la volonté de coopéra-  tion et de solidarité qui s'est manifestée. Nous signalons qu'à cette occasion,  l'Unesco n'a pas manqué de nous apporter sa contribution.
18.10 C'est pourquoi nous invitons l'Unesco à renforcer sa coopération avec  les organisations féminines et tout autre mouvement en faveur de la paix et des  droits des femmes en vue de promouvoir le rôle des femmes dans le renforcement  de la paix. Dans cet esprit, Monsieur le Président, je voudrais mettre un accent  tout particulier sur le problème de l'apartheid. Les efforts de la communauté  internationale doivent être multipliés pour que soit éliminé à jamais et cela  avant la fin de ce siècle, l'odieux système de l'apartheid, reconnu comme crime  contre l'humanité.
18.11 Monsieur le Président, la coopération multilatérale, par le canal de  l'Unesco, a contribué depuis quarante ans à la sauvegarde de la paix mondiale,  au développement de l'éducation, de la science, de la culture et de la communi-  cation en vue de l'instauration de la justice sociale et du bien-être de tous  les peuples. L'universalité de l'Unesco, tant au niveau de ses Etats membres  qu'à celui de ses moyens, est essentielle pour que puisse se poursuivre et se  renforcer la réalisation de ces objectifs dans ses domaines de compétence.
18.12 Dans la période de tensions internationales OU nous sommes et dans un  monde confronte aux problèmes de l'ignorance, de l'analphabétisme, de la misère,  de la faim, de la maladie et des agressions contre l'identité culturelle, la  Fédération démocratique internationale des femmes réaffirme son attachement au  multilatéralisme du système des Nations Unies ainsi qu'à la restauration et à la  préservation de l'universalité de l'Unesco. Nous réaffirmons notre soutien à  l'orientation et aux activités de cette institution, axée sur la réalisation des  nobles idéaux que lui assigne son Acte constitutif, et souhaitons notamment le  maintien du grand programme I et du grand programme XIV. En ce qui concerne  l'analyse des problèmes qui se posent dans les domaines de competence de  l'Unesco, la Fédération démocratique internationale des femmes soutient l'ap-  proche plurisectorielle et pluridisciplinaire qui a servi à l'élaboration du  deuxième Plan à moyen terme. Monsieur le Président, pour terminer, nous réaffir-  mons notre détermination à oeuvrer ensemble avec l'Unesco pour la paix, la jus-  tice sociale et le bien-être des peuples. Je vous remercie.
(19) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Spanish):  I thank the Permanent Representative of the Women's International Democratic  Federation for her statement and I invite Mr Rao Chelikani, Chairman of the Co-  ordinating Committee for International Voluntary Service, to take the floor.
20.1 Mr CHELIKANI (Co-ordinating Committee for International Voluntary  Service) :  Mr President, Mr Director-General, Excellencies, ladies and gentlemen,  our committee, the Co-ordinating Committee for International Voluntary Service,  called (CCIVS) , is composed of 108 member organizations, of which 13 are  themselves international organizations, having members in all parts of the world.  Our principal mission is to bring additional energies to the service of the  community aiid thereby to mould the social dimension of the individual who makes  these efforts. This is what we call voluntary service. Our organization was, in  fact, sponsored by Unesco in 1948. Since that time we have been constantly and  consistently collaborating with Unesco in many aspects of its work.
20.2 As a non-governmental organization with category A status, we regularly  offer our comments and suggestions in the context of the conception and the  preparation of Unesco's biennial programmes as well as the Medium-Term Plans, and  we closely associate ourselves also with the execution of those programmes  approved by you, the Member States. We have been contributing to the best of our  abilities and experience to the very useful sectoral consultations launched by  Unesco in the fields of youth and literacy.
20.3 In view of this, Mr President, we appreciate very much this opportunity  given to us to address the Member States. We are not unaware,.,of the exceptional  situation that Unesco is facing these days. We would like to say that we hope  that this situation is an opportunity also for sea-changes in Unesco, to which we  are firmly attached. No great institution can cater to the fast changing needs of  mankind unless it is disposed to periodic, if not constant, adjustments to  reality. The expectations entertained with regard to this Organization as well as  the number of its Member States have radically increased since its establishment.  We look to you, who exercise political authority and who are known for vision and  intellectual achievements, to accomplish this historical task.
20.4 A vital aspect of Unesco's functioning, concerning which ample political  will is often manifested but not much is translated into action, is the policy of  decentralization. Despite the efforts made in the last biennium, amounts spent at  Headquarters are still disproportionate to the total spending in all the Regional  Oftices put together. This is a situation that needs to be improved.
20.5 While reserving our detailed comments on various programmes for the  debates in the commissions, we would like to draw your attention to only one or  two points corresponding to our main preoccupations.
20.6 Having young people and students as the main participants in voluntary  work and convinced of the great role they play in laying lasting foundations for  peace, international understanding, a new international economic order and  national development, we appeal to Unesco to offer further opportunities to youth  and to youth Organizations to contribute to Unesco's work. It should be said to  the credit of Unesco that what it already does for youth and with youth movements  is unsurpassed by any other United Nations agency. A major programme on youth and  more systematic consultations of youth at the regional levels in co-operation  with the regional centres could establish more permanent and direct contact with  them. These wishes were expressed by the Collective Consultation of Youth NGOs,  at its session last September in Madrid, in the joint Declaration which you will  hear tomorrow.
20.7 Mr President, kindly allow me to say frankly that it is not very  creaitable for Unesco, whose fortieth anniversary we have celebrated recently, or  for Member States, to have failed to äevote far more resources, people and  innovative measures to the eradication of illiteracy. Without the total  eradication of illiteracy and without post-literacy activities, all investments  in education, in terms of intellectual and financial resources, could serve only  to help the already privileged sections of society, thereby enhancing the power  gap between the rich and the poor. International Literacy Year is a golden  opportunity for us, the NGO community, committed to this urgent cause, and for  you, the Member States, who have this task as a pressing obligation, to work  together, through Unesco as a lead-organization, to prepare ourselves to make  illiteracy disappear by the year 2000. Kay we look to the Member States  announcing here the launching of national campaigns? We observe that significant  gains in literacy rates are obtained only in countries where there have been  national campaigns. ILY is not a year for celebration in honour of something; it  is a year in which governments should double, if not triple, the budget to hasten  to make illiteracy a thing of the past. So, it is going to be a matter of  resources and results, and it will also be a challenge to the new technologies in  mass communication.
20.8 Furthermore, should we not, right now, envisage in the coming biennial  programme and budget ways and means to prepare the ILY? We request you to contact  your national delegations, which have left for New York, and propose to them to  suggest that the United Nations General Assembly instruct UNDP and the affiliates  of the World bank to increase financial support to literacy national campaigns.
20.9 For our part, we in the voluntary service organizations have made the  firm resolution to be your partners in the mobilization of people in concrete  activities in literacy work, as well as in other fields of Unesco's work, such as  the conservation of the cultural heritage and the protection of the environment,  the education and training of youth, and the promotion of peace and development  in general. We want to continue this on the national and international levels,  and arrive at fruitful co-operation between governments and NGOs.
20.10 With your permission, Mr President, may we express our sincere wish to  see this twenty-fourth session of the General Conference hold productive  discussions and take the necessary decisions on the preoccupations expressed  above. Thank you, Mr President.
(21)  Voluntary Service for his statement.  The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Spanish):  I thank the Chairman of the Co-ordinating Committee for International  APPEAL BY THE DIRECTOR-GENERAL FOR THE SAFEGUARDING OF THE ISLAMIC HERITAGE OF  THE CITY OF JERUSALEM  APPEL DU DIRECTEUR GENERAL EN FAVEUR DE LA SAUVEGARDE DU PATRIMOINE ISLAMIQUE DE  LA VILLE DE JERUSALEM  LLAMAMIENTO DEL DIRECTOR GENERAL EN FAVOR DE LA SALVAGUARDIA DEL PATRIMONIO  ISLAMIC0 DE LA CIUDAD DE JERUSALEN  nPM3bIB TEHEPAJibHOTO HWPEKTOPA O COXPAHEHWW HCJIAMCKOTO HACJIEAWX WEPYCAJIWMA  e.dl +d g L Y l  ~1-31 U1 Al > CWI &.I r l ~   ,%3=9% If%P'F%%*%F%i%Pwqq
(22) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Spanish):  Having come to the end of our list of speakers for this afternoon, and as  was duly announced, I now give the floor to the Director-General, who will make an  appeal for the safeguarding of the Islamic heritage of Jerusalem.
23.1 Le DIRECTEUR GENERAL :  Monsieur le Président, Mesdames, Messieurs, voici l'Appel international  que je lance en faveur de la sauvegarde du patrimoine islamique de la ville de  Jérusalem, en exécution de la décision 5.4.1 adoptée le 7 octobre 1986 par le  Conseil exécutif i% sa 125e session.
23.2 Depuis quarante années, Jérusalem se trouve au coeur du problème du  Proche-Orient. Cette ville, sainte entre toutes, dont le nom est devenu synonyme  de paix entre les hommes, est aujourd'hui l'objet de tensions qui portent  atteinte à sa vocation.
23.3 Le message de tolérance, de respect et d'amour qui fut délivré dans  cette Cité - et dont la Bible, les Evangiles et le Coran se sont tour i% tour  fait l'écho, y est cruellement blessé par des antagonismes contraires i% l'esprit  de ces Livres sacrés.
23.4 La foi en un Dieu unique qui, au-delà de la diversité des cultes, lie  entre eux les Juifs, les Chrétiens et les Musulmans dans un même acte de recon-  naissance envers le Créateur, ne devrait-elle pas inspirer, en ce lieu sacré,  une vision d'avenir qui proclame clairement la primauté des valeurs de justice  et de solidarité sur la division et la violence ?
23.5 La paix entre croyants a régné autrefois en ce lieu. Le riche patrimoine  monumental créé par les fidèles des trois religions en témoigne encore aujour-  d'hui. Les mosquées, les églises, les synagogues, participent 5 tous les moments  de la vie quotidienne, rappelant en permanence aux habitants de Jérusalem, ainsi  qu'aux millions de pelerins qui la visitent chaque année, les grands moments de  ce passé trois fois irremplaçable.
23.6 Au cours des dernières décennies, les différentes communautés reli-  gieuses ont consenti des efforts considérables pour assurer la sauvegarde, la  restauration ou la mise en valeur des monuments relevant de leur culte. Mais  beaucoup reste encore à faire. Notamment pour ce qui concerne le patrimoine  islamique. Les mosquées d'Omar et Al-Aqsa, les dizaines de sanctuaires plus  modestes, les madrassas, les tombes, les bibliothèques, dispersés dans toute la  vieille ville, ont fortement contribué à forger l'image traditionnelle de  Jérusalem que tout Juif, tout Chrétien, tout Musulman porte dans son coeur. Et  cependant, une partie importante de cet exceptionnel patrimoine islamique est  aujourd'hui dans un état de conservation précaire, et court même le risque de  disparaître.
23.7 Si l'on veut garantir l'avenir de ce patrimoine, si l'on veut rendre  toute sa splendeur à ce témoignage religieux et artistique unique, un mouvement  de solidarité internationale s'impose. L'effort à consentir dépasse en effet  largement les moyens de la communauté locale, alors même que son objectif con-  cerne plus de deux milliards d'hommes, qui tiennent Jérusalem pour l'un des  foyers de leur vie spirituelle.
23.8 C'est pourquoi, conformément 6 la décision 5.4.1 adoptée le 7 octobre
1986 par le Conseil exécutif de l'Unesco lors de sa 125e session, je lance un  appel pressant à la communauté internationale, à tous les croyants du monde et  en particulier aux Musulmans, afin qu'ils apportent leur contribution 6 la  restauration, à la sauvegarde et à la préservation du patrimoine culturel et  religieux islamique de Jérusalem.
23.9 J'invite les gouvernements des Etats membres de l'Unesco et de tous les  autres pays, les organisations internationales intergouvernementales et non gou-  verfiementales, les institutions et fondations publiques et privées et tous les  organismes de financement, 5 participer, par les moyens qui leur paraîtront les  plus appropriés, à l'accomplissement de ia tâche sacrée entreprise par le waqf,  propriétaire et gardien de ce patrimoine.
23.10 J'invite tous ceux qui ont pour mission d'informer, 5 sensibiliser  pleinement le public à la signification des travaux qu'exige, de toute urgence,  la préservation de ce prestigieux patrimoine, et à inciter par là les peuples du  monde entier à contribuer généreusement à cette oeuvre commune.
23.11 La coopération internationale pour la sauvegarde du patrimoine islamique  de Jérusalem sera, pour tous ceux qui voudront s'y associer, l'occasion de  témoigner leur attachement à la vocation éternelle de la ville, celle de symbolii  ser la communion des hommes de tous horizons, de toutes croyances et de toutes  races, solidaires d'un seul et même destin planétaire. Je vous remercie.
(24.1) The PRESIDENT (Translation from the Spanish):  culture and for the world in general.
(24.2) Ladies and gentlemen, that concludes our business for today. The meeting  is adjourned.  I thank the Director-General for his appeal which is of such importance for  The meeting rose at 6.30 p.m.  La séance est levée à 18 h.30  Se levanta la sesión a las 18.30